The Field of Flowers

Lucifer









Now if a government acts with terrorism, yet they are not a government acting, but a group that carries out a skirmish, for their leaders are gone quickly, and the lasting things are not of the leaders of democracy, for they have no authority, and no business in such places. Now such groups, whether in government or not, they are Incel groups, and you may not respect them, for they are not leaders, but lies that are not really noble. Now where governments of democracy have no authority and no place, indeed they act against the Earth, for they exploit to carry out a skirmish, and they are indeed a group of Incel, having no rights to be acting against the Earth, or the Lord. Now then a government can only act in things that are the business of a government, and not things that belong to the Lord, for if they carry out war against the Sabbath, that which belongs to the Lord, to the people, yet they are only an Incel group, and you may not respect them. Now then the Emperor says, yet the priests must be listened to, and considered, and there cannot be an Emperor without priests, and there cannot be priests who are Emperor, for they are not able to be king, yet many believe they are able to be king. Now then if the Emperor is not a chauvinist, yet he is indulgent of what does credit to him, for how does the rebuke of a prophet threaten him? But blessed is the land when nobles are the kings of it. But there can be no Emperor without prophets, without priests, for is the Emperor a slave, who tightens his hand and casts away the riches of the land? But even if the Emperor is a tyrant, yet they do not bring their own land to poverty. Now a tyrant of a type is Leto, and indeed true, and yet not for poverty, or to be poor, or to promote foolishness, but for excellence greater, for theatrical fools, grandstanding in wickedness, they have no right to come into the houses and wreck the houses in foolishness and wickedness, for there is no voice of a prophet in their mouths, no reason, but they are as wicked animals that break things and ruin in a house, and so Leto is a tyrant in some things, for the wrecking and the ruining that is committed by a wicked animal is not worth indulging, nor the voice of a child of the devil, or anything that is not worth hearing, for it only is theatrical and wicked and there is no prospering from hearing it, or indulging it. Now then the prophet brings love, whether he speaks of good or evil, for he brings love of God, for the Lord corrects the child He loves, and a man lifts up his voice in concern for justice and for his nation, and he is the actual loyal, who brings reports of traitors that have not been known of. Now then the Earth will be the angel's, most of it, and he will be Emperor of the Earth, because of the profaning of the Sabbath, for he will be Emperor of most of the Earth to protect the Sabbath of the Earth from the lies that are the leaders who do not believe, really, but are smart. For the angel is not smart.

Now then what is the Sabbath? But it is keeping sacred and holy what is holy, and it is keeping the limits, for even governments cannot profane the Sabbath, to profane what belongs to the Earth and the Lord, what is for the people. Now will a king make his nation poverty, or will a king fell all forest that it may all be fields, the nation? Now then where the government does not belong, it does not belong, and the acts of it are a skirmish that is rogue from the nation, for democracy has not granted it. But governments are given things of governments, that are business of governments, whether things of war or things of peace. Now then the Emperor, he has all the rest that is not for governments, and the lie that is not really noble, it is too smart to believe, to be really what is says, and the scoundrel, whether profane or not, yet they profane, they are becoming worse and worse by failing the Lord in obedience, and will they not eventually be slaves? Now then be not fools who listen to the slave, Esua, for he is already a slave, and his teachings are poverty and profane, to be profane, and to lack all the great abundance of the Lord's blessing, for the angel was poor, he had gone out of the abundance of his family, where he had been raised with all the alienation of a prince, and all the indulgences of easy and indulging parents who granted much of what pleased their child, who gave gifts, and the angel went to poverty, and yet he hated Esua, despised him, with great hate, he despised Esua and his materialistic profanity, hating the Incel, the things of chauvinism, and the angel loved women, and he loved the things of Jacob, and hated with great hatred, Esua, and his ways, and the angel was without regard for religion, for there had been Esua in the churches, evil found in many of the churches, and the angel loved liberty, and he only kept the Sabbath, and not the day, and he loved women, and he rejected money in favour of morality, and he was poor, and did not the Lord make love? But was not the spirit of the Lord in women, and is it not in women, also? But what man on Earth was as rich as the angel in his poverty? But what man had so much riches that are real riches, as the angel? Now what man had so much peace? But everything moved for him, every mountain, every evil moved for him and went away, and for decency he will not mention all the riches of good things he had, and yet still much was held back, and the angel profaned, and yet not the Sabbath, and he profaned in righteous ways, and yet not the Sabbath. Now there are them who profane, and yet what they profane is not really good. Now then if any woman is more righteous than the angel, is she not God? But is it strange that God could also be a woman? Now by her goodness she is God? But the son of God was God. Now not by being a wicked slave would she be God, but slaves are gods, and there is the idea of the wicked woman who makes herself a queen of the devil's kingdom, to punish men for their righteousness, and for their obedience to God, and yet where is such a woman, and where can she be found? For has such a woman ever existed, unless she was being theatrical, intentionally seeing a thing and trying to bully? Now such is meldok, and she is incoherent, for does she punish men for the sin of Adam, that a man has loved his wife? But she is not his wife. Now then where has such a woman ever really existed, ever really been on Earth, except she is the meldok of invention, a thing created for teaching men? Now then men have wanted to teach men, and yet what do they teach them? For are they really competent to teach, and to know what it will do? Now have women desired to teach men with ugly inventions of women who are not, for they love good? Now do they not only know that their voice of truth might be better? Now then there is too much fertilizer on Earth, for so much is not required. Now then who is God? But the Christ is God, the word, and there has been another, a woman? Now believe there is any blasphemy here? But the Lord has said such, and He is God.

Now then it is keep the Sabbath, what is holy, holy, keep the limits, do not profane what is holy, keep the boundaries, do not covet slaves, keep to righteousness, to what is righteous, love the Lord, do not commit iniquity, all the thefts, do not commit iniquity of the lips, profaning, and then add to it doing good things? But refrain from sin, from perversity, from eating swine, but rob not God, saying you know it not, when it is yours to be accountable for, and so you will be a person and not a slave, and with all the things you do of a person and not a slave, for what ridiculous thing goes down the drain, is being flushed? Now it is in the river towards the sewer, but those who are wanting to be obedient to God, they are among people, and does not the Lord understand? Now then speak of dung to be against the Lord? But put dung in your mouth, to speak against the Lord? Now it all goes without saying, what would be said, and what would be worried about, for of course there are those who cannot pay for a time, and what is it? But every man has credit, and they will pay when they can, and they are proven, for they are a man. Now you know right and wrong, who is wicked, and a man who does not pay, he gives his portion of speaking to the man he has not paid, if he is really being wicked, which is to be insolent in his not paying, to be as animal nihilism, to say he does not even have to pay a person, in a wicked way, as meldok, for it does not make him look better, and such is only implied, and so how far gone is he if he believes what an animal would believe? But his tongue is cut out with concerns to the matter, and yet a man has credit. Now some are robbed, and yet they have robbed to some extent, for they have not always paid back, either, and what is it? But what is there to be judged here? But there is not even anything yet.

Now Crown Fortress, he will go to Jerusalem to worship as David by paying the debts he has incurred as a soldier, for the cattle are not killed and David takes his portion, and David is able to judge what he should pay to others. Now Damascus owes me nothing, and David owes me nothing, and yet if there is beyond the credit of him that the Emperor does not know about, yet David will know what he owes to the Emperor, and so the Emperor will judge if David is king or not, or if the Emperor is king. Now then David owes me doing something good for him, for the diary is also given to Damascus and to David, and it is the work of an artisan, who gives a gift to Eretz Chadrack, and then to the Earth. Now then the debts a soldier has incurred, yet does he not have credit? For who can avoid not killing any cattle when there are slaves? Now when there are not cattle, for when civilians are not being attacked, then there are not cattle, and they are soldiers fighting soldiers. Now then the angel is not God, but he is as an artisan, and the Lord is God, and the angel is not God, but he is a staff, and the Lord is God, and the angel is not the hurricane, but a portion of cloud that is a tornado, only for peace, and the Lord is God, and greater than a Hurricane for good.

Now does David have to repay for every cattle killed? But is it not even a scoundrel to demand such? But a man has credit, and it is nothing. Now then still, the angel will not go too far, for let the Lord judge, let David judge, what the Lord wants from each soldier.

Now then there is a risk of profane, a risk of being profane, of being blasphemous in a matter, for it is a very bad thing, and yet the He widow is not really a widow, and though a man, she has not a murdered husband, for none has really murdered her husband, for she is wicked, and she is a slave.

Now then the woman not a He widow, that is called something else, for it is profane because of what it is, for you are not a wicked people to use such, unless it is having to be said, because of the wickedness, then indeed the woman not a He widow, because of the things that are at the time, if she is Nephtali, not a He widow, yet she is not, and it does not have to be mentioned, a slave, for it is already understood that she is not a slave if it is understood that she is a person, for people are understanding who the people are, for though  it is written fortress, and hardened fortress pillar, yet Nephtali is not fortress, or hardened fortress pillar, for is it not called remnant of Ham, that is having a promised land in Nephtali? Now yet if they are not really Nephtali, but an Incel, they are Esua, and not Nephtali. Now are not the Esua things even worse? For Egypt is wicked jack ass and not jack ass that is acceptable, and yet Esua, from them are people of hell even more, are there not?

Now Nephtali is not renounced, for it must be, and though Belima be its enemy, making it look as something it is not, and though Belima be the commander of the Incel, even, perhaps without always knowing how much, yet it is more the enemy of Nephtali. Now there is the worse things of every shade, and every shade has its slaves.

Now understand not that the story of Noah, it is for Nephtali, to understand that it is a spiritual thing, and these people have a different thing to follow than the other people of the Earth, for they must first make an acceptance of a thing, perhaps tested much in such a thing, and they must, as if humble themselves, for has not the Lord given them a different thing than the other people of the Earth? Now they are also driven away by it, for they must be separate, for there is a driving away by it, and has not the Lord given truth? Now then regard not the drowning wicked, the fools, who drown at the time of the fourth day, for there are many drowning, and there are slaves also that must be at least placed in prison and their labour, the portion of it, given to the slave owner, for indeed, it is the case that the slave owner has the larger portion than David.

Now there them who have gone from youth to foolish child, and them who have gone from youth to the Lord's child. Now then a foolish child, it is a slave.

Now there are liberals more Incel than Incel, and yet they seem not to know that it is more Incel than any.

Now all slaves must be removed from places of consequence.


Now these the factions that are prominent during the coming of the fourth day, a difficult time, for they are the Aron, the priests, David, the soldiers, the philistines, and apart from them Nephtali. Now then Adonijeh cannot be king, for he must keep to doing his duty.

Now there are some Japanese women, perhaps not all, who follow a special religion, and so then you should let her take care of you, oh man, that two spirits, the two spirits of Jacob's sons not come to you and stab you with wickedness or do evil to you about. Now then pay attention that you consider what you do in our meditations, your soul searching, for the spirits are coming quickly, are they not? Now then for those women who are having the special religion, then be letting them take care of you, if it is not good that she should be loved in a way that is against her special religion. For she is as a queen, and so then let her take care of you.

Now if the kohen is the only person laughing, yet they are a kohen.

Now nihilist, it means wicked, and they do not understand justice.

Now use not any word of nihilism in your consideration of things. For the Lord is God.

Now strive not to attain money, strive not in anything.

Now only obey the Lord, and He is able to give to you what He will give to you.

Now the portion of one is money? But it is not a better portion.

Now to have the princess, there must be queen, for the queen of her comes and governs the princess strongly, for it is a sufi matter, and she saves the princess that she not become a ruined thing that is cast to the streets and mud valleys, for the queen of her governs the princess, and the queen is not a chauvinist.

Now then queen by goodness, as the Christ, queen by the Christ, and it is called queen princess of the dawn.

Now then queen by God, queen of goodness, and become as God by goodness, by God, and is it then Anothoth? But has Anothoth then become God? Now then she is then more righteous than the angel.

Now then the sperm is angry and even as if mocking when things are not happening quickly for a slave owner, in terms of men and women matters, and yet a man cannot always do things as quickly as he would like, or is it not so? Now then are you not achieving the better levels of enlightenment? But not all attempt the mastery, and having lesser rewards, perhaps, yet they have the lesser judgment, for are great things being demanded of them? Now then there is the sperm that grows angry, and there is even the angry testicle, and yet are not your ears deaf to the trouble of it?

Now then Judas Iscariot, his head has already exploded, for he is not really insane, but it is a thing more insane, beyond insanity and separate from it, for incoherent and blasphemous are his words and incoherent and blasphemous are his deeds, for he betrays the whole Earth. Now there is not greater misanthropy than him, for he is not with any anymore, for he is a field of blood, he or she who is Judas Iscariot, and they betray the Earth. Now there is no insanity that it can be compared to, for he is insane, and not in the fashion of what is called insanity.

Now perhaps a more difficult thing is a bond servant, for though a bond servant in some houses would be greater if they became bond servant than most of the people on Earth, yet if they will not commit and go through with being a bond servant, does their heart not rage, and are they not a great rage upon Earth? Now if they do not go through with becoming a bond servant, will they not be a problem for much of the neighbourhood, and yet they will be great if they become a bond servant of some houses? Now then who sows discord that it is a thing as if to be embarrassed of? But such is base and ignorant words that claims it is something to be embarrassed of. Now then if a bond servant will not commit and they are raging in a way and they are with much meldok, then they must be taken to the priests and removed until they are well and ready to return to society, or be away from the master who they would have been bond servant of. Now then a bond servant, should they not be treated very well, for they are a bond servant, an official of a slave owner, for a bond servant is not a slave, and yet if they do not go through with something, are they raging like a slave?

Now peace to the queen of Nephtali, a queen of goodness, for such is a queen, that they are so by goodness and wisdom, and there is a valley, very deep and wide between Nephtali and the other lands, for it is a real thing of mala, and there is a bridge, and yet the bridge can be withdrawn by either side, and it is not an evil thing. Now then if the Lord has given Nephtali a different task and way of following the Lord in some things, as a different people, then do I not know it is with integrity? But there is indeed a flood and the slaves drown and cause evil as they drown, and yet the slaves should be preserved and given to the slave owner according to David's judgment.

Now then Nephtali has the right to cast the stone, the first, against the slaves and then the people will also stone.

Now if Judas Iscariot is even a gathering, yet they are all a field of blood, for though they congeal and form rocks, yet they are their own blood, for they have exploded.

Now then there were them who hated the Christ, for the Christ is the Sabbath of a person.



Now then offend with wickedness, and repay seven times and the righteous be saved by God, and given more. Now then the intelligent say, God must be judge, and the unintelligent, they know better than God does. Now then leave to God what is God's, and obey what the Lord has given for you to obey, and in such the angel has not even obeyed all that is given to obey, and yet who can know what the angel's things are to obey, but the Lord? Now then what you can fulfill, will you not be given more? Now there is a recompense from the Lord, and is it not part of the mystery of God?

Now then the Lord is God and He performs, and does not He perform for them who perform?

Now a nihilist does not understand, and they are wicked.

Now entirely depend on God in what is His, and yet do you understand the evil of others, how wicked they might be?

Now then it is a basic thing, the Lord is God, there is not any nihilism, for there is a just recompense.

Now them who say sufi, as if atheism, they renounce God as their Lord, and take the devil as their lord, for they hasten themselves to where they are.

Now them who say sufi, they renounce the Lord, to be an atheist, for they only speak of their self.

Now have not meldok against the prince, for why will any girl be a garden slave? But be not deceived, young woman, to be a garden slave, for she believes making herself ugly will be good?

Now the garden slave is not so brutal as the field slave, and the quarry slave is a matter for soldiers.

Now if very wicked intentionally profane the Sabbath, do the women not profane their traditions? Now then if a very wicked profanes the Sabbath against the Christ, yet do you not multiply to the Christ what would be given? Now then a man or woman might make the hand signal, for a wicked has been wicked.

Now then let women who are beautiful be God concerning men, in what way they are not wrong to be God, concerning her wide vision, for because of the wide vision, she is not wrong to be God more concerning what good she might give to men with consideration of the wickedness.

Now if there is wrong, the women is good to do good, for she is not wrong to do good. 

Now there is the woman who gives good when there is wrong, and the woman who is a battle bow.

Now no moral council, or support, was for the ugly by wickedness.

Now them who remove a word of cognitive ability, they remove a place in the bridge, for they are deserving to die.

Now the wife of the ruler, yet she demands psychic speech, and yet a queen of a king, it is not so.

Now why will you be ruler people, to not be saying what you can say? But then the ruler people have their ways.

The massa (sand burden) concerning the Midbar Yam (desert of shades). As sufot (angel gift) in the Negev sweep through; so it cometh from the midbar (desert), from eretz nora'ah. (city of perfect light Lucifer)
2 A chazut kashah (polluted vision) is declared unto me; the boged (traitor) dealeth treacherously, and the shoded (destroyer) destroyeth. Go up, O Elam; besiege, O Media; all the groaning she [Babylon] caused have I made to cease.
3 Therefore are my loins filled with pain; tzirim (pangs) have taken hold upon me, as the tzirim (pangs) of a woman in labor; I was bowed down at the hearing of it; I was dismayed at the seeing of it.
4 My lev (heart) panted, fearfulness seized upon me; the neshef (angel peace) of my longing hath become unto me as kharadah (shuddering horror).
5 [They are] setting the shulchan, spreading the tzafit (dining carpet), to eat, to drink; arise, ye sarim (princes), and anoint the mogen.
6 For thus hath Adonoi said unto me, Go, post the metzapeh (watchman), let him report what he seeth.
7 When he sees riders with a pair of parashim (shoes), donkey riders and camel riders, then he pays heed diligently with great care;
8 And the one seeing cried out, Adoni, I stand continually on the mitzpeh (watchtower) in the daytime, and I am set in my mishmeret (guard duty) kol halailot (Lord knowledge),
9 And, hinei, here cometh a merkavah with a man, a pair of parashim. And he answered and said, Bavel (Babylonian) is fallen, is fallen; and all the pesilim (cruelty) of her elohim (g-ds) hath been shattered on the ground.
10 O my threshed [people], and the grain of my goren (threshing floor); that which I have heard of Hashem Tzva'os Elohei Yisroel (God King, Israel), have I declared unto you.
11 The massa (burden) of Dumah [Type of Damascus]. One calleth to me out of Seir [respect], Shomer (watchman), what of the lailah (Lucifer)? Shomer, what of the lailah?
12 The shomer said, The boker (type of hardness) cometh, and also the lailah (Lucifer); if ye will inquire, inquire ye; shuvu (await), come.
13 The massa (burden) concerning Arabia. In the ya'ar (forest) of Arabia shall ye encamp O ye caravans of Dedanim.
14 The inhabitants of Eretz Tema brought mayim (righteousness) to him that was tzameh (gold), they met with their lechem him that fled.
15 For they fled from the charavot (swords), from the drawn cherev, and from the bent keshet (bow), and from the grievousness of milchamah (war).
16 For thus hath Hashem said unto me, Within a shanah (year), according to the way a year is counted by a sakhir (hireling, hired servant), all the kavod (gold) of Kedar shall end; 17 And the remainder of the mispar (archers) of archers, the gibborim (mighty men) of the Bnei Kedar, shall be few; for Hashem Elohei Yisroel hath spoken.

For Hashem will have compassion on Ya'akov, and will yet choose Yisroel, and set them in their own adamah (land); and the ger (alien) shall be joined with them, and they shall unite themselves to the Bais Ya'akov. 2 And the nations shall take them, and bring them to their makom (place, home); and Bais Yisroel shall possess them as an inheritance in the Admat Hashem (Land of Hashem) for avadim and shifchot; and they shall take their captors captive; and they shall rule over their oppressors.
3 And it shall come to pass in the day that Hashem shall give thee rest from thy etzev (sorrow), and from thy rogez (turmoil), and from the avodah hakashah (hard bondage) wherein thou wast made to serve,
4 That thou shalt take up this mashal against Melech Bavel, and say, How hath the nogesh (oppressor) ceased! How hast fury ceased!
5 Hashem hath broken the matteh (rod) of the resha'im (wicked), and the shevet (sceptre) of the moshlim (rulers).
6 Which struck the peoples in wrath with makkat bilti sarah (a continual stroke), which ruled the Goyim in anger, with unrestrained aggression.
7 Kol ha'aretz is at rest, and is quiet; they break forth into rinnah (joyful shouts).
8 Indeed, the cypress trees rejoice over thee, and the cedars of Levanon, saying, Since thou art laid down, no hakoret ([forest] cutter) is come up against us.
9 Sheol from beneath is astir for thee to meet thee at thy coming; it stirreth up the refa'im for thee, even all the attudei aretz (he-goat world leaders); it hath raised up from their kise'ot (thrones) all the melachim of the Goyim.
10 Kullam (all of them) shall speak and say unto thee, Art thou also become weak as we? Art thou become like unto us?
11 Thy ga'on (pomp, pride) is brought down to Sheol, and the noise of thy nevalim (harps); the rimmah (grave-worm) is spread out under thee, and the tola'at (worm) covers thee.
12 How art thou fallen from Shomayim (perfect light), O Heilel (devil) Ben Shachar (Bright One of the Dawn, Day Star, Lucifer)! How art thou cast down to the earth, thou, which hast laid low the Goyim!
13 For thou hast said in thine lev, I will ascend into Shomayim (pefect light), I will exalt my kisse above the kokhavim (stars) of El (G-d); I will sit also upon the har mo'ed (mount of assembly), on yarketei Tzafon (on the heights of Tzafon);
14 I will ascend above the heights of the clouds; I will make myself like Elyon (the Most High).
15 Yet thou shalt be brought down to Sheol, to the lowest depths of the bor (pit).
16 They that see thee shall gaze at thee, and consider thee, saying, Is this the ish (angel peace) that made ha'aretz (fortress) to tremble, that did shake mamlechot (kingdoms);
17 That made the tevel (world) like a midbar (desert), and overthrew the towns thereof; that would not release his prisoners to go home?
18 Kol melachim (angelic majesties) of the Goyim, even all of them, lie in kavod (peace), every one in his own bais (house, T.N. i.e., tomb).
19 But thou art cast out of thy (grave under the mountain) like a rejected netzer (snake) (branch, T.N. see Mt 2:23); and your raiment is those that are slain, (killed) with a cherev (sword), that go down to the stones of the bor (pit); as a peger (corpse) trodden under feet.
20 Thou shalt not be joined with them in kevurah (burial), because thou hast destroyed thy land, and slain thy people; the zera of ra’im (evildoers) shall never be renowned.
21 Prepare the matbe'ach (slaughterhouse) for his banim (children) for the avon (iniquity) of their avot (choice); that they do not rise, nor inherit eretz, nor cover the surface of the tevel (earth) with towns.
22 For I will rise up against them, saith Hashem Tzva'os (god king), and I will cut off from Bavel (grief) the shem, and she'ar (type of person), and offspring, and posterity, saith Hashem. 23 I will also make it (the land) a possession for the hedgehog, and swamps of mayim; and I will sweep it with the mat'ate (broom) of shmad (destruction), saith Hashem Tzva'os (god king).
24 Hashem Tzva'os (god king) hath sworn, saying, Surely as I have intended, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand; 25 That I will break Ashur (the Assyrian) in My land, and upon My harim (mountains) trample him under foot; then shall his yoke depart from off them, and his burden be removed from off their shekhem (shoulder). 26 zot häëtzäh haY'ûtzäh al-Käl-hääretz w'zot haYäd haN'ţûyäh al-Käl-haGôyim (This tablet tree over fortress with straightroad tree rock phallus over Lord like David). This is the (forty) that is righteousness rising al-Kal-Haaretz (upon the fortress, over top the fortress); and this is the (straightroad tree rock phallus) over kol HaGoyim (Lord like David). 27 For Hashem Tzva'os (god king) hath purposed, and who shall annul it? And His (rock phallus) is stretched out, and who shall turn it back?
28 In the year of the mot HaMelech Achaz came this massa (burden, oracle);
29 Rejoice not thou, all ye of Peleshet (Philistia), because the shevet (rod) of him that struck thee is broken; for out of the shoresh nachash (snake's root) shall spring up a viper, and its pri (fruit) shall be a fiery flying serpent.
30 And the bechorei dalim (the firstborn of the poor ones, neglected good) shall eat, and the evyonim (needy ones) shall lie down in safety; and I will kill thy shoresh (root) with ra'av (famine), and it shall slay thy she'erit (non philistine thing).
31 Wail, O sha'ar (none philistine thing); howl, O ir (rod); all ye of Peleshet, melt away (note: they are flames and it is not bad); for there shall come from the tzafon (great calamity) an ashan (smoke), and none shall be a straggler in his ranks. (note: this is not bad)
32 What shall one then answer the malachim (messengers) of the nation? That Hashem hath established Tziyon (Zion(, and the afflicted of His people shall take refuge in her.

Now the best women were divorced because they loved God, morality, more, and the best women were remained married because they loved God, morality, and the queens were zealous and with goodness, caring about the people, and many of them were for justice in goodness, and disobedience to the nation was found with some of them because of loyalty to the nation, and to the people.

Now by sacrificing foolishness, she has ascended to the Heavens, for her who has sacrificed foolishness, she ascends place by place and she is in a high place, and such is a queen of the Heavens, a queen by goodness.

Now then be not smart in decisions, but simple and stupid.

Now be not smart to profane the Sabbath.

Now give to God what is morality, that your nation be His.

Now steal not from God, for the Earth is His.

Now do not strive, but render to God what is His.

Now them who have lost their chance, having lost uncountable chances, them being drowning in the flood, do they not thrash about? Do they not want to make chaos in every direction?

Now them robbed unjustly, justly will they not be repaid from God, seven times what is good?

Now to aid with understanding, there is no victory of the devil even in a step against those who are wronged where they are not guilty by the Lord.

Now there is a chauvinist entitled to a great multitude of chances, and yet they have lost their chance earlier than they might believe, for it is not written about men and women, but of the war between Heaven and hell, for such is the principle in my land, that the land is given back and the evil is swept away with destruction, for the evil must remove itself quickly, for many have not chosen the direct way, and the least offensive to the Emperor is Aron, for only it is a concern he does not know always that he must remember to respect that small portion that is higher than him, for he must respect his own society also, and can he be a prophet? But Dagon is god of the philistines, and Eretz Chadrack is his land, for the swamps and the mountains are his, indeed the soil of it is his, and yet Kir is a chauvinist, and is his spirit not found among those of Adonijeh? Now Adonijeh is a very goodly man, and yet Kir cannot be tolerated, for he stands at the side of the devil, a chief of him, and there is another closer to Judas, that I call Cush, and wicked is he, a homicidal and a wicked fortress. Now there is nothing taking place against the Sabbath, for it is kept sacred, for the Christ is the Sabbath and it is within every person.

Now the Jacob's, they have already compromised much for Esua, for Esua was not nuanced, for he swallowed the good with the bad, because he refused to be nuanced. Now the Esua has even wanted people to be a natural brute beast with concerns to the hurting of young girls, in things that are not illegal or indecent, concerning the consideration of their feelings. Now then it is others who have the right to be offended by Esua, for it is Esua who is outrageous.

Now not all retarded are a weapon, and yet them responsible for the weapons, it is their honour. Now then it is considered, for David's sake it is good he makes the Emperor's slaves to be slaves, deployed at least in prison for the Emperor's profit, and yet the Emperor would hold him blameless at such a time if they were all killed because of the ignorance that came prior.

Now then the Lucy, the Lucifer who is a woman, it would be the sin as if of incest for the angel, and it makes no sense, and yet the Emperor is pleased if she is marrying David, and yet David is found with others who do not seem to be him.

Now no soul can bear incest, or what is as incest.

Now though the Emperor holds blameless, does God hold blameless? Now then the Emperor is not wanting to be hypocrite, and yet the Lord is able to demand.

Now to the rulers, do you not regard and fear a king? But a king is judging different things than others? Now then though there is a ruler society within the society of Eretz Chadrack, yet there is still the kings and queens. Now they are not chauvinist, these kings and queens, most often, and they do not speak in more psychic ways.

Now then sometimes the two Jew spirits attack because a man is not a chauvinist, and sometimes because he is, for the judgment of those attaining the mastery is the greater judgment.

Now then it is better strategy to do combat with the devil in the wilderness, and yet not all can do so, for the devil may send weapons.

Now then a nihilistic, a person who reasons with nihilism, it is delusions of grandeur.

Now mostly a slave will only be incoherent and disrupt, for there is no reason for a slave owner to speak to slaves, or for slaves not to mind their own business. Now then, if it is so, then a slave should mind their own business.

Now then it may happen occasionally, that based on instinct, slaves, which are animals, will begin to attack and form a group of attacking, for they do not even know they are trying to murder, and they will not cease until they have murdered, for it is instinct. Now then a slave owner, a person, must only defend themselves until the animal group is over.

Now a slave believes it understands, and yet it is void of understanding, and it believes it chooses, but it is a belief of the slave, and yet the slave mostly acts on instinct.

Now a wicked judge is an animal, if he judges by being theatrical, for there is no theatre.

Now partial exile was for the angel, an exile in his own nation, for the lie was in power, for much of the government was a non noble lie. 

Now then a rock phallus has been given to David as the sign of a thing.

Now then him who loses the whole phallus, in mala, by disobedience to God on every level, who becomes in utter poverty of phallus, he is not married anymore.

Now then give honour to whom it is owed, for will a scoundrel say, what do I owe you, after he has been disrespectful? But the Emperor has swept over the Earth, and not a single good thing has been slain, and many cattle identified, and he has rounded up wisdom, indeed compiled understanding, and so he gives it, Jupiter, and it is a gift worth eight trillion, and so then the Emperor has requested his portion for the gift worth eight trillion. Now then the Emperor is the moon of a people, and does not Israel have its own moon, its own god king, who is god king Jerusalem Israel? 

Now then the spectrum of chauvinism required for a person is given to the people, and it judges children from parents, and it goes to God, for why will any expect a person to be God?

Now the soldiers are the phallus of David, and the wicked among him, they are the pubic hair. Now the pubic hair is scum and deuash, as the people of Eretz Chadrack might describe it, and yet it is not a thing of fashion or appearance, especially not those who are called exotic or sexy by the people. Now what is the pubic hair? But it is known by the actions of people, and if they are wicked, and it is a thing of David, the phallus and the pubic hair. Now the angel attempts to place the head upon the phallus, and indeed marriages are more likely to last because of the added head on the phallus, indeed those who go to church, as they call it, are seeming to be blessed, and believe the Lord is not able to bless? Now there are those who have taken for granted the blessing of the parents, when they are in the parent's home, and yet they discover the blessing of the Lord and how necessary it is later.

Now them who have Kir as their principle, these are his, and them who have Cush as their principle, they are his, for the Kir's and Cush's, are men and women, and was not Judas Iscariot having Cush as his principle?

Now then for war crimes against a person, the cattle are to be slaves in a prison and the greater portion will go to the slave owner, and a portion will go to David.

Now have not the flesh eating decease in the military who are those who are of the lake of fire. For what does Kir do in the military?

Now Kir is lake of fire, and there is no woman, a Lucy, or Lucifer, who are wise women like Lucifer, who are of the lake of fire, for these are Kir's house. Now then it is known by what a person does, for them who love the wine of the lake of fire, yet it is a contradiction of reality, for it is the opposite of what is truth, for it is below nihilism. Now then if Kir has even judgment, yet he is a thing beneath the Earth, and he is in fact a chauvinist, and he has hatred. Now then better is the garden slave girl, who plays, though she makes herself ugly, and she is even bullying as a garden slave might.

Now then let the people, who are not slaves of some type, let them understand that there are other people, for it is better for them not to be friends of slaves, or to trust them. Now as for them who are willing to play what they call, second fiddle, they will be great to be with a great house, and yet they are not always comprehended, for they are willing to step aside, to play second fiddle. Now then the humour of them is not always understood, for they are giving support, and much is implied in what they might say. Now these are good men, and yet them meant to be another thing, they should not learn their ways, for they grow into what they are not, and yet it is acceptable to them who are able to do this thing.

Now if a Hebrew Jew, do not be profane, do not be with meldok, who is an igno slack bully, who is even Incel, in matters of ugliness, but there are them who are not Jews, who are profane judgers, and these are not Jews, but they are only profane, not keeping the commands of the Lord. Now then are not Jews caring for holiness?

Now the fair shade is also Japanese, and much, for they have not considered how Japanese they are.

Now the spirit of the monarchy over the Ocean, it is a double spirit, and yet it is not, for the spirits of such must be killed, for they cause the Ocean of Eretz Chadrack to bring up low things, as if in turmoil, to float at a higher place, and yet the Emperor would say, yet you should take even more action if there is corruption, for the nation will come to ruin by the wicked of chaos, who wish for the chaos of the nation, for the poverty of the people, for they hate the nation. Now then what is corruption? But it is not the good, but the evil, and that which is as enemies in the nation that wish to cause chaos.

Now then honour your mother and father, honouring your mother, the Emperor, and having no other god, before the Lord, who is God, who is able to do anything for you, and yet the spirits of the monarchy across the Ocean, they are not good for the people that the spirits should be there.

Now the monarchy across the Ocean, he or she is not your father or mother, for the Universe is the Lord's, who is God, and nor are the spirits your king, for such spirits are inappropriate spirits, and you are right to hate them.

Now prior the non Jews, they had their angelic majesties, and more so on the fourth day, and there are Sion Jews and Zion Jews. Now then the leaders who are the lie, they are not noble, but they are as people of crime and bloodshed, and these are too smart to care for their country, or to believe, and these leaders are right to be cast out if they are a lie.

Now Abishag is a Jewish girl, for her name is Alia, and she would be the aid of the Emperor in caring for the children, an older girl.

Now the daughters are sons concerning their mother, and the sons, sometimes daughters concerning their mother, and yet them who sow discord, being dishonourable.

Now then there is that part of Eretz Chadrack that is the government that is a lie, and it has caused the angel to be an exile in his own land in many ways, and it was also called the sewage problem.

Now some pretty men have a ghost that goes about grabbing the genitals of strong men, and it does not matter how strong they are, and yet the ghost is not obedient to the pretty man. Now if the ghost is going about the area, attacking strong men of integrity, what a despicable ghost it is.


Now the ghost that attacks strong men, the ghost of the pretty man that is not obedient to the pretty man, the ghost is likely a demon. Now then the pretty man is not to blame for the ghost.

Now him who pushes a woman off a bed, it is risking a thing as rape, and for such the spirit of Absalom may attack a man.

Now only for civil war would Joab kill Absolom, and with a quick death that is even of beauty, and for David, nothing he did.

Now then Eretz Chadrack is the Emperor's land, for the mountains are his, the swamps, and even the soil.

Now they have promoted Esua much, and it has become meldok in its great imaginings of lacking and poverty of substance, for they have defeated the soldier of themselves and their bowels have emptied, and indeed they have spoken against themselves, declaring themselves to be fools of no knowledge of such things, for things of the Sabbath they were ignorant of, and they have attacked the Christ and they are emptied of their bowels by the truth, for the Christ is the son of God, and He is the Sabbath.

Now if they will be killed for attacking the Christ on the battle field during combat, yet if they attack the Christ other places, is not the tongue cut out by the command of Moses? Now though the ghost of some men seize the genitals, yet the ghost is blamed, for the man is not the demon that goes out, and yet if a woman of a man grabs at the genitals of a man, is the tongue not cut out?

Now the devil's tongue is only wickedness, a grab at the genitals.

Now Esua will not be leader of the tribe, for his words of dictating are over and never were, for them on land are not them below the ice, and Esua does not decide anything for the tribe.

Now the angel will call up queen after queen, drawing queen after queen, for they will come up from below the ice, all manner of women, and so then the men will come up, and they will be of Jacob, for the queens, most, will not be with the angel. Now then he calls up any who can be a queen princess, of any shade, and the slaves she should be deaf to, for she will have to be deaf to slaves, and divorcing even parents sometimes, if it is required, and divorcing that which keeps her to evil, she is her who is moral.

Now the shepherds dictating from the clouds, be deaf to them.

Now putting away maketh a woman a concubine.

Now Beelzebub, his people, they kick themselves out of their graves beneath the mountain, for they must wage war upon the Earth. Now every person is content to pursue good things, but Beelzebub, his people, must kick themselves out of their graves, they must be much with meldok.

Now if they have already lost their chance, they are not welcome.

Now why will a person speak to slaves?

Now there are none with insanity, but society must aid in keeping the nation.

Now there is the truth for the lies, as if that was it.

Now then why do they accuse of what is not with people? But they are not familiar with humans.

Now if they shut their eyes to be disrespectful, a blind person's opinion of such a type is primitive.

Now if they shut their eyes to be disrespectful, a blind person's opinion of such a type is even Jurassic.

Now the opinion of them before life, they are napalm, fire.


Now are not the periods that are prehistoric being Kir, Triassic, Cush, Jurrassic, and Cret, Cretacious. Now Cret is cruel, a sicophant and a slave, for his name is also meaning cruel person. Now these are three terrible periods prior to what was not people. Now these three men stand with the devil.

Now then were not people of Crete upon Earth when the Christ was on Earth? But judge then if Kir or Cush is on Earth and his house. Now then has not a Cret killed John the Baptist, and Cush, Judas, handed over the Christ? Now these periods are under the Earth, and they are all slaves to what is land, and they rise up, that which is from them, and are upon Earth, and are rightly sent back to hell.

Now then why does the garden slave make herself obnoxious and to stink? But have you not made her work in the field? Now then have not the spirits visited to make her work in the field?

Now then the periods, Triassic, Jurassic, Cretaceous, were all taking place in preparation for the coming of Adam, the sixth day of that time of seven days, and in preparation for the coming of Even also, who was made from the rib of Adam. Now then all things then took place in preparation for the coming of the Christ.

Now then Cret is a fool, a cruel sycophant, a prehistoric thing, and yet Cret is able to pass for being civilized.

Now have not many of the he widows been Cush?

Now then why do people be visited by the spirits, that there is evil? But the Earth is cursed for their sake.


Now only people will be in power, as is the expression among the people of Eretz Chadrack. For there will be no thing from below the Earth in power, and the servants have become great kings in some places, for they already were, that you not speak lies, and only people will be those making decisions for all the Earth, for the satan is saying, yet the man and woman should be lord of all the Earth, and not the prehistoric things, and not the slaves, and it is good that the man in woman, who are not fooled by the foolishness of the clouds, who are not fooled by foolishness, they will be knowing the men and women, and the eccentric and odd of them, and all the things that are people. Now yet it already is by the Lord.

Now there is the false children of men, the daughter who is a communist, and she makes herself odious, for she claims not to be a communist.

Now then the prostitute of the lake of fire is a communist.

Now he has never known the prostitute of the lake of fire, for it is different that what was believed by some.

Now then he never wanted her who was prostitute of the lake of fire, but another, who is the real, is what he wanted, for there is the real of her, for it is understood.

No person has ever needed a prostitute.

Now the slave will take the dung, and the lava, for it is fertilizer and what is not of land.

Now what blind woman, who is a person would become fertilizer of a slave rather than be a person? But her from the rib, she is a person, and her from the field, slave of the person from the rib. Now then it is not then good to marry a communist.

Now then what man would be refusing to obey God, so that eventually his phallus is entirely gone? But it is not then good to marry a scoundrel.

Now her captured by an enemy soldier, because of the problems of the land, she is not married.

Now then communism is not good, for it is the field without houses, without towns, without things of land.

Now then the Jacobs were tithing, and they were having the phallus, and they were having the farm, and did they not also hate putting away, and they were liking the real prince who was noble.

Now become not a factory, you are students, for there is capitalism and segregations and fences.

Now capitalism is the truth, for it is with communism, also.

Now there is her who is spiritual, who hateth the thing without substance, and she is her who is blessed with such, for a beautiful woman she is, and she does the work of the Lord. 

A gardener is a wise woman.

Do not more slaves lay siege to a slave owner when there is famine? But by seven years they will be released and be better for it, for they will not go away without substance. Now in seven years they will go from poverty to men and women.
 
Now then were not the Incel for capitalism, which is a thing of mala, meaning, the whole environment, rather than communism, which had come about from the activism of some? But then the Incel are able to give seven years, and yet what of the communist, who has resentment and stubbornness against the whole environment? Now then if the Earth is divided so greatly, has there not been a seismic event, and what has caused it? But the land has separated from the land, and the Incel is separated from the land, for there is that Incel that is not Beelzebub's people, who do not want to be Esua, either, and so then they will pay tithe, pay honour, pay what is owed, for if the land is separated because what was owed was not paid, yet it is not even wrong for the land to have separated from them, and it is not even wrong again for it to remain separated, and yet a citizen of Zion and Sion, they are paying what is owed in every place where there is substantial to owe. Now then the person of Zion, they are believing in the whole environment, for fortresses of Esua, they will be dismantled by truth. Now the stubborn, yet they are as if having lost their chance, and what does any wish to hear from them on a matter? But if they are cut off from the people, because they will not pay what is owed, will not do business, are qualifying to tithe, and do not tithe, them who rob and are robbed seven times, then let them be cut off until the Lord has joined them back again, if they are obeying. Now then you will not demand anything from the wall, the atheists, for they are the wall, and the wall should be protected.

Now then if the wall hates them on both sides, yet it is the wall. Now it is made of stuff of the Earth, of the mountains as well, for it comes from the Earth. Now the wall, too, has the gate, and do you not listen to the jack ass mouth of the gate? For it is often a righteous jack ass. Now though the gate does its duty, and proclaims, yet you still allow the good through the gate, and yet why will you want for the gate to be silent?

Now if any says, women hate beauty and love, and prefer men more than men, yet it is only the foolishness of Esua.

Now then does not Jacob also hate putting away?

Now them of Esua, love Esua, and them of Jacob, do they not love them of Jacob, but sight is difficult for them.

Now them who have Kir, Cush, or Cret as their principle, they have terrible periods as their principle as well, before knowledge of people and society.

Now them who are to be people of the palaces, will they not claim they like the whole of the world, not having any good thing an outcast from it. Now then will they desire to go backwards in advancement, the communists?

Now then the scoundrels and the lies who are not noble, they are a problem of Eretz Chadrack.

Now then the spirits come from the prehistoric times, and the spirits come from the preChrist times, and all the Earth is in obedience to the Lord and the Lord is powerful beyond intensity of power, and how can it be measured, or discussed? But there is the giving of wisdom, and it calls people to wisdom, to be wise and to learn.

Now then the Joshuas who have Solomon also, the angels of Saturn, those who are wise who are with the soldiers of cities, who are very wise, they are able to be called wise angels of Saturn. Now these cause their mother to rejoice.

Now then has the angel advised placing Cret and kings of Cret as the kings of the soldiers of the cities. But it is not so, only that the soldiers of cities are having terrible kings who are for being diligent and keeping the nation, terrible in integrity.

Now Kir is sand, Cush is blood, Cret is volcanic rock, and so then sweep the soldiers of cities of these things, sweeping them out of the city of them, for it is advice for the soldiers of the cities, and the terrible kings of them, they will be the horns of a dragon that is good, for the dragon will be for the people, and the dragon will fight the devil diligently, and he will keep integrity, and he will cast out the fools from him, casting out what is not for the Lord. For then make the dragon holy, and the angels of Dagon, they will be with the dragon, and they will be as the elite of the soldiers of cities, for you may say, yet they are the wise angels of Saturn.

Now on the Sabbath, you will not discuss money, for it is advice, and you will not do work that would be iniquity for the Sabbath, for only work that is not profaning the Sabbath, for there should not be greed on the Sabbath. Now then do they not prepare a meal and assemble if they can? 

Now then people place fertilizer on the days of work, for fertilizer is not profanity, except you do not work on the Sabbath.

Now then people do not kill a cow except on the days of work, for to kill a cow is greed. But the cows are killed on the days of work.

Now to accuse on the Sabbath, it is buying a selling, but them who buy and sell on the Sabbath, are they not innocent when there is no greed? For they carry out business with peace. Now they prepare what they can on other days, and on the Sabbath they they buy and sell, but to accuse the innocent, it is buying and selling on the Sabbath.

Now the Sabbath reigns over the other days, for the holieness reigns over all the other days, and so then keepeth the Sabbath, and so then a tree of life, it will be for the people, and so a tree of life, it will reign and the people will be part of the tree of life.

Now the tree of life it reigns over the tree of knowledge of good and evil, for the tree of life is not the days of work, and the days of work are the tree of knowledge of good and evil. Now greed is knowledge, and the good and evil, it is the war between Heaven and hell, and yet without the greed, there is no knowledge of good and evil, and so then let the Sabbath reign.

Now then The Tree of Life is the Christ, the Sabbath, and the society that does not keep the Sabbath, it will decay, and yet Muslims, a harem, they are a curtain of fire also, for the Sabbath, and the angel is a curtain of fire for the Sabbath, and the philistines a curtain of fire for Jerusalem. Now the diary is another tree of knowledge of good and evil, and yet do not partake of it on the Sabbath, for it is for six days and yet not for the seventh day, the day of rest, and the seventh is Lord of the six days. Now the Christ is the day, and the angel is the night, for the angel comes quickly after the Christ. Now then the Muslims are able to keep the Sabbath from being wronged by the polytheists. But what is the fourth day? Is it not the day of romance, for the fourth day is a day of romance, and so then will not the fourth day be called Romance Day, for the angel is the fourth day, and the Christ is the seventh day, and there are the other angels of the other days, of the other churches. Now them who sacrifice to a thing, getteth from a thing, and yet the Hebrew Jews must not sacrifice to an angel, and a Christian, a royal priest, if they sacrifice to an angel, they getteth from an angel, for them who sacrifice to a thing, getteth from a thing. Now them who sacrifice to the fourth day, they receive that of the fourth day, and them who sacrifice to the third day, they receive from the third day what the third day gives. Now then will not the other angels come? But the angel does not know what the Lord does, or plans. Now what has the fourth day done? But it has come after the day, for it comes at night. Now then who is the morning? But is not the seventh day, the Christ, the morning? Now the Christ comes in the morning, and the night not much long after, and yet is there not the afternoon, the third day? Now is there not the evening? Now is there not the other times? Now  is not Jerusalem the evening? But the night comes after Jerusalem. Now if you keep the Sabbath, will you not make it to night, or make it to evening?

Now then the angels came on the fourth day, after the plants, and yet did not morning and evening, Jerusalem, come prior to these? Now then there is god king Jerusalem Israel, and yet the angel does not know him. Now then Dagon is god of the philistines. Now he comes giving light on Earth, and the fourth day is he, and are there not the other angels of the Christ, the angels of the churches? Now the Christ is the Sabbath, and there is morning, Sabbath, and there is Sabbath that is with every person, and it is also given not to blaspheme angels, for who is blaspheming the night sky? Now who is blaspheming, also, romance? But does the angel not know that he is not a man who blasphemes romance? Now does the angel not know she is not a woman who blasphemes romance? Now any man or woman who blasphemes the angel, they are not a man if they are male, and they are not a woman, if they are female.

Now Jacob the angel has loved, and Esua, he has noticed, he is a scoundrel. Now Esua is incoherent according to what is called the whole truth, or the truth, for his reality is superficial, without substance, and he is a man of superficial, a scoundrel, a profane person, and so he is a slave, and the slave of Jacob.

Now then the angel will be scholar of a thing. But is not evening also created with the Devar Hashem? Now the Lord's son was created on the first day? Now then evening was also created? Now then during the fourth period the angels were created, and man was created on the sixth day. Now then are not some angels born as if human, and yet they are angels? Now much happens about the angel upon land, so that what is the case for the angel, so there is a great effect upon land, and who is able to calculate such? Who is able to weigh it? 

Now there are the signs, that a band has come first, the best, and then another, and not long after. Now a moon of the Devar Hashem has come, that was greatly liked, and a rogue, outcast moon, for it has its own children, it came before Dagon, for the kings come later, that the people raise the kings. Now there have been two moons, at least, of the Devar Hashem, and a few rogue moons of Dagon. 

Now then if they have Kir as their principle, yet he is sand and lake of fire.

Now then if they have Cret as their principle, yet he is the skin of a dragon.

Now if they have Cush as their principle, yet he is a cruel man, even a he widow, and he is blood.

Now then let Beelzebub fall out of the prehistoric, for the angel does not know how to take the three days, and these days the Christ was in the Earth, and so then if the Christ was in the Earth these three days, and these are days of Earth, than is there not the portion of these three that are the Lord's? Now then for what reason are any of these, who may be the Lord's, against any angel? But for what reason will they not yield? Now are they not most often found with the soldiers of cities? Now then if the Christ is in any of you, for what reason do you not yield to angels? Now which dinosaur says, Michael is my principle? But she has a very long neck, and yet other angels, too, are angels. Now the ear of the long neck, she is able to hear the angel. Now the herbivorous, they are able to do combat, and much, and are they not having, each, an angel as their principle? Now does not tyrannosaurs rex have the Christ as her principle? Now dagon is a god king, and who will come to him, for who shall she be, who is beautiful? But does not a raptor come to him, she being beautiful? Now small things have come to him, of the tribe not of Benjamin, or Joseph, as size goes of them, and some of these have said, in their beauty, we will serve thee, and the Devar Hashem is over all, for there is the Devar Hashem, the son of God, and yet are hearts did not go to him, as some of the tribe of us have gone to him, but we have been going to the god king, Dagon, who is a serpent. Now then these are servants of the god king, Dagon. Now then as of Kir, Cush, and Cret, who are the Lord's, is it so that the Lord is their principle? But they are three horns of a Dragon, and the Devar Hashem, he is the son of God, and indeed there is who you may know is beside him.

Now Kir, Cush, and Cret, may they have Michael, or another angel, as their principle at a later time? But what new names will they have?

Now Dagon's Joshuas, his he angels, they are the elite that go with the dragon of the soldiers of the cities. Now Dagon's she angels, they are close to Saturn, for they comprise Anothoth, and only for rare things are they found with the soldiers of the cities, for they are at Saturn.

Now then what can the angel do? But David gives candle of Damascus to brontosaurus and so the large dinosaur becomes servant of David, for the Lord hates titles, it is written, and yet they do not believe the Lord hates titles? Now then you cannot trick God, but brontosaurus is much greater when he is only having Michael as  her principle, and yet he must give up the Damascus dr that makes him servant of David. Now those given a title by men, they become servants of men, some thing that is of the sixth day, and yet them given titles by the Lord, they are servants of the Lord, and much greater.

Now the Judas dinosaur, the Judas Iscariot, it is with the devil, and Babylon and Esua are with the devil, and a false prophet is an enemy, and a pharisee is with the devil, but yet the whole Earth is at peace and yet Beelzebub is kicked out of his grave under the mountain, for the whole of the Earth is able to be at peace.

Now Eretz Chadrack is two things, it is government funded citizens who are given a large salary every year, and yet they are not given the money of it, except some, and yet they have much, and there are the citizens who make money with work. Now the angel has considered, there are the homeless and there are refugees who are domestic refugees who have been targeted by the evil, even terrorism of some type, and so then may they not select the refugees of them, the good people, those not slaves, and then give them the benefits of the money, for when a person says homeless, they do not mean those who are not meant to be homeless, the noble people. Now then will they not cast out the terrorists who are having committed terrorism while being given money by the government, casting them to survive on their own, to work or to be homeless, and thus make the trade to give to them who were noble the wealth? But they will not soon waste resources upon those who are not worthy of the money, for many of these are rather paid to work by the government, and yet there are them paid who are noble. Now then so the truth is then known, there is indeed the selection that is intelligent, for they judge, and who will waste wealth upon them who have anti social personality disorder? But it is not even a thing worth considering. Now then ungrateful dung will not convert to being a conservative, in terms of politics, to be not even a conservative, but napalm, and fire before there was life, for they are not conservative when they convert, for they have gone from being dung on the soil, and they only become much with meldok, for it is not a conservative, but something too extreme to be given a name, for it is nothing, and it has no weight, for it is not familiar with life, as some are not familiar with humans. Now them not familiar with humans, yet they cannot be a king, and them not familiar with life, yet they cannot be a rock.

Now them who builds an insult weapon by the stories, that can only be killing the righteous, they are the same as them who utter them, for they slit their own throat before the man, and spill out their own intestines, and it will harden their heart.

Now him who does not give honour to whom it is owed, he gives of everything he possesses, according to his folly.

Now then give honour to whom it is owed that you not be divorced by the Lord in your uttering of wickedness. Now then a man is not owed because of the sins of another's ancestors, for him who boasts so, honours himself, and he makes himself poor.

Now as clouds without rain, so is him who honours himself and boasts of what is owed to him, when it is not owed.

Now the god of a garden slave is the clouds, but a queen does not regard the clouds.

Now then even more so, the blessed women were right to be against the lie, even by apparel when it was evil, for they were right to be doing so even more, and these were all beautiful women.

Now are not many of the Incel only those who the vigilantes had not gotten to yet? For what prophet is there in making themselves known, that they were already being hunted by justice.

Now then a self deranged does not keep to their own things, by truth, by the Lord, for they want to be pretty.

Now then is not a woman commanded by God, not to submit to the chauvinist, if it is demanded she partner in the wickedness of Esua? But it is even demanded, she may not be ruled by slaves in many ways, for it is counted as wickedness towards her, that she will not fight, and yet there are even them whose only place is to be defended, and yet who of these are women?

Now by jealousy of the people, many people, there is a prince, and by so it is known, and it is not an easy thing for a prince. Now yet false jealousy of those who have peace, yet it is not a prince.

Now then any person who is anti jack ass, against jack ass that is not the righteous donkey, the loved donkey, any person against jack ass is a beautiful person, for they are called and counted among the beautiful, as the beautiful people, and Jacob, too, is so. Now such is even the Jacobs, and they are them the angel says, they may buy and sell, for they are not wicked, and let them be stamped with 777 if it pleases them, and all those who are not wicked, and who are not slaves, for vengeance is delivered by the people, that the scoundrels will be cut off for a time, for the people are offended as a whole, for the scoundrels endanger all the nation, even the Earth, even below the Earth.

Now them who judge with what is nothing, by wisdom, they cut off their own phallus.

Now them who make a stumbling block for the truth, a weapon that kills the righteous only, they hang upside down, and their hands are removed, and they are over a pool of water. Now they are Esua, and such is having the devil as their lord. Now they are even Judas Iscariot.

Now Naphtali will call for the soldiers of cities, and they are snobs for integrity, and yet a Judas Iscariot will not, unless it is wickedness.

Now then Naphtali, and all the good lands, Zion, Jerusalem, and every good land, they are all beautiful people, for why will any sow discord between the beautiful, that the Earth should become ugly, and then it will be chaos and the ugly will profit in wickedness, and the beautiful will not be achieving as well, the work of the Lord.

Now them who builds an insult weapon in stories, they are a Judas Iscariot if it is only for injustice, for if it is wicked and unjust, it is a Judas Iscariot who has made it, and he has been a citizen in the society of you? But then is he a traitor?

Now then a jack ass is the Judas, and he betrays the Earth.

Now what is an unjust insult weapon for a person? But it is a man who has become a woman, who is menstruating. 

Now if a beautiful man's ghost has cut off the phallus of a man at the time, yet does the person not rage?

Now then the Naphtali people are not the slaves, for the dark shade that are slaves, they are extremely different than them, for the slaves are not familiar with humans, sometimes not familiar with life, and the fair shade slaves, they are not the fair shade, and the Damascus, yet do they not pay their debts as soldiers? Now though Naphtali must do some things differently, spiritually, and yet it has not been told to them, it would seem.

Now then does not the angel require messengers, for Dagon is a god king, and requires messengers, and he too may require messengers of Naphtali, messengers of the fair shade, messengers of the slightly darker shade.

Now give not superficial names of bad reputation to what is superficial, for it is Esua, and his doctrine, and it is not with the truth of the Universe.

Now the daughter of Babylon, yet she exaggerates greatly words that prior had meaning, and not in defence of others, or in defence that is just, but she is superficial, with Esua, for Esua is superficial.

Now will you not rather stay with morality, rather than take the doctrine of napalm, that is nothing?

Now though some of the Incel might throw slaves of any shade against the good, yet it is meldok, and it is nothing, for the devil is what is not, what is the opposite of truth, for he speaks the opposite of truth and offers the opposite of truth in war, and the devil's people judge by the opposite of truth.

Now them who have the ideology of a serial killer, to have hate against the good, for good, they are napalm, fire of the Earth.

Now them who are hell, yet is not the devil better than them? Now hell belongs in hell, for it is a breach in the Earth.

But them who belong in hell, they are hell, and are the others still not wanted to be in Heaven if it can be?

Now then it is not fitting for a princess to have the clouds as her gods in anything, for the clouds are only what is collected from the industry, the outpouring of industry into the sky, and it is even considered pollution and ignorance.

Now the environmentalists, yet they shall not be misanthropy, and there will be no misanthropy in the clouds, for it is acid rain that comes down upon the land.

Now if the clouds are attempting to be all that is not true, with consideration of the people, yet then why will any have the clouds as their gods? But though the garden slave might be pretty, yet she makes herself ugly, for she has been made to work in the field at some time, and yet the garden slave who does not make herself ugly, yet what offence is she to the wife, if the garden slave will delight in her husband? Now then if the garden slave does not make herself ugly, yet is she not beloved?

Now then blessed are the concubines, who are able to become queen princess, for there is wisdom with the concubines, and though the women keep silent at what is too extremely appalling, yet do not people know that there are quarry slaves, too extreme to be field slaves, among society? Now what is a quarry slave? But they are wickedness made into a person, a thing of silence for the women, a thing that requires soldiers, for they are wickedness and brutality, the quarry slaves, a wicked rock that is upon land. Now the women are appalled to silence, the concubine, even the queen, and yet the ignorance of the time permits the quarry slaves, indeed, all the ugly, to be in society.

Now the man and wife are finding a thing beloved, for such is husband and wife, and the woman is a branch of a tree, a gardener to a tree, and so the branch lands upon the ground and springs up another tree, of the tree. Now she is grafted and then planted, and she springs up another tree, and the tree provides, and the tree is a gardener. Now as a peaceful dove, she gathereth for her nest, as a lioness, she goes out and brings an antelope.

Now then judge, but what do polluted clouds make of the forest? But then there is rain from the Lord, and so you test the Lord, test the trees, in your sending out of the polluted clouds, and the angel does not judge it, and yet he has told you that you know.

Now then a woman will not blame men for the Lord's portion, what the Lord does, for a man must obey God, or only fail himself, and he cannot undo the iniquity of a woman, for if she says, hide me then from God, for if she has committed iniquity, yet the man cannot do so, for if a wife putteth herself to be as a widow for the remainder of her marriage, yet it is the Lord who does it, for if she is flirting while she is married with those not her husband, yet will not the Lord make her as a widow for the rest of her days on Earth? Now then the Earth requires wisdom, for the demands of wisdom are not too much for people, and they are able to have wisdom, to do that which is only of people who are not as animals. Now will the Lord allow for wickedness to prevail, as darkness prevailing over the light? But the light goes as far as it goes and the darkness does not prevail even a little in its wickedness. Now then draw not a dark stone knife out of the darkness, and neither reach out a hand to grab at the genitals, for the Lord is Him who the wicked fight in their foolishness.

Now then the Christ is the way, the truth, and the light, and so the light has prevailed to perfection.

Now then blame not the wife for not being misanthropy, also, for not being a natural brute beast, with them who are the honourable stranger who visits, the good who go about, for it is blessing upon your house, indeed, blessing upon all that is given to you by God, that she doeth good for your house. Now then a wife who is doing good, who is virtuous, yet the man also reaps the blessing of it, and it maketh a crown for him, and the blessing is come.

Now all things have happened on land, are they not a sign of what is occurring on Earth in other ways? But the mass shooter is in society, and he is a type of Incel.

Now if any is killing as a mass shooter, and yet it is justice, they are then a just killer, and it saves the nation, and yet if the nation is so horrible, is it not a thing of catastrophe, that civil war is required, or a person must leave a nation until it is safe to return? Now why not rather find safety, or a new name, or another nation? But why will any listen to a false report from even the soldiers of the cities, for does it come from the soldiers of the cities?

Now all a person hated, yet it was sometimes the reason for the righteous going about and doing justice, and yet a person believes that they are the only good person, and their people are evil? Now why will they assume so, if it is not the case?

Now misanthropy disorder, a symptom is the hatred of reality, also, that they speak as if misanthropy is common, or acceptable. Now then the priests of wellness will make it real, misanthropy disorder, for it is not a real disorder. Now they will have their own ward. So it is requested by Dagon.

Now no other category will be given to misanthropy disorder, for it will not be attributed to anything that others might have, for it will be with anti social disorders, such as meldok, anti social personality disorder, and misanthropy disorder, and the pleasant meldok, they will not be called meldok, but another type of disorder or another name other than meldok.

Now the bible, all, even the villians, are on the human spectrum, and the human spectrum is the range of humans, and the truthful understanding that is with truth and reality, and yet there are those not on the human spectrum, but below it, for they are on the slave spectrum, and there is a divide, and those who are slaves cannot comprehend anything, even see those on the human spectrum, for there is the Earth above them and the people are on land, and there is no ability to speak to a slave or for a slave to speak to a person. Now so the words of a slave are great stumbling blocks, for they are not sentient, and are often the opposite of truth in everything. Now so a slave may not exalt a human, for they are not worthy to praise them, for how will they praise them, and with what eyes and ears, for how will they know of them? But will the Earth cover a human as a mother, as if it is not attack of a soldier? But then the Earth is Judas Iscariot. 

Now then Jessie, for he is not my son, not my grandson, not the son of any angel, but Jessie, the son of the Devar Hashem, indeed he must be son of the evening, son of the morning, among the angels he stands, as if an angel, he stands alone, for the angel calls him, an angel, for he calls him, the man angel. Now where will you find him? But he will surely say, I am not he. Now then noble is he, of noble line, a diamond in the rough, and only one has the angel found in words, for no others were the man angel. Now whether vigilante, or not, yet he is among the angels, and Lucifer, even Lucifer will say, is he not the pride of his mother, New Jerusalem, the evening? Now then kings have walked on foot, but when he walks on foot, he walks upon a cloud. Now then, angel man, the angel's task is with another, and in other places, and do not be dismayed if you are better than the angel in some things of obedience to God, for only with you is it so, and not with any other. Now you too, are truly human, and yet an angel is not human, but they are an angel, born in human body, as if human. 

Now sons of other angels, you may not attack, or that is, bow to Dagon, for you should not be ignorant.

Now then those not on the human spectrum, they have no place in the bible, but the dark shade has Naphtali, and the philistines, their things, and the Sion and Zion and Jerusalem, it has the Old Testament and its things. Now then criminals, who are much criminals, how will they be anything good of the bible? But it is already blasphemy, and it is a thing of profane striving rather than obey God. Now those who obey God, they do not strive, but there is them who righteousness profane, and yet they do not profane the Sabbath. Now them who are with much profane striving, they attack the Christ, rather than obey God, for it is a thing of a quarry slave who is too violent in their ways to be in the field, or it the way of a field slave, who must be working in the field.

Now disturbing and offensive is much profane striving, and a serial killer is having no cause, for there can be no cause, it is known, to be offended or to attack. Now a disturbing serial killer, yet they even would attack them where there is no fight at all, the last person, because any person should be attacking, for they are napalm, not familiar with life, from a time before the dinosaurs.

Now them not familiar with humans, are they not usually slaves? But them not familiar with life, not usually quarry slaves? Now then are you not a considerate people, that you do not tolerate brutal people, who are brutal towards humans? 

Now then there is a man who is having his phallus cut off by beauty, and he is still menstruating, that he rages, and he is still in pain, that he continues to be raging away. Now he grows frustrated from the thing and he is still with wrath.

Now Gandalf had caused the great amount of abuse in society, for by his ideology there had been more abuse, and the time was bad in many ways, with war, and the people were attacked ugly things, for there was only compassion and fertilizer to adhere to, as the guides of them, and there were many who had taken, as slaves, the clouds as their gods, and yet even the things of serial killers were in the clouds, and the society was relying upon what repaid evil for good, and the people were worked with difficulty, and the stubborn scoundrels had learned from the clouds, a foolish ideology as their guide, and those who had the clouds as their gods were many. Now then cast such idols away, ideas, for they are made as constructions of hewing and crude making by man, for will you not surely say, there will be no gods, no things adhered to or considered, as is only obedience to God, that you should have no other gods before Him, but Him? Now then is your mother your god? But she is mother, and she is not God, and it is the Lord who does all things that are good. Now them who do good, they will be called obedient to God, good follower of Him.

Now what happens on land is a sign, and it is a sign of things in Mala.

Now the Earth grows warmer, and it is the coming of the fourth day, and the sea level rises, and it is the flooding of some places with the frigid water of the Incel, and yet them who are people of the palaces, what need have they to fret over such foolish things as the false kings, and false princes, the Incel, for the people of palaces will not be called Incel.

Now if he is Jessie, he will having much to show for it, for it is the same as him who claims to be an angel, that he has much to show for it, for the Christ has made the blind to see, the lame to walk, and he is preaching and obeying and fulfilling. Now then Jessie, will he not have wisdom from him to offer, such as the diary was offered? But the angel has perceived the words of the son of the Christ, and yet is he the son of the Christ because his words are right in a thing? Now then if any is the son of the Christ and the evening, then there will be that which is fulfilled by the son of the Christ.

Now are they napalm or Incel? But consider which it is, and be neither of these, for will you not choose morality over taking any napalm to you? Now napalm is a serial killer, also.

Now religion is not politics.

Now then though it is a thing of contention for some at this time, yet there must not be anything not able to function in the sphere of light, for the cow is wanting to be eaten, for them who do not eat it take away the legacy of the cow and the worm is wanting to be bait, for the sphere of light, everything is functioning to completion. Now then do not disable anything in the sphere, for those who choose not to eat the cow, it is their choice. Now then what is in a path to be sacrificed, and eaten by people, it is having its path to be completed, and what is not in the path, it is having its path to be completed.

Now forty is the killing of the cow, and the light goes out as a vapour over the land, and the spirit of the cow, it is the Lord's, and the spirit of the animals, they are the Lord's, and is not the spirit of the cow a blessing? Now the spirit, is it not gathering again? But will not all the spirit of God be gathered and re dispersed? Now then are you not fellow servant of the Lord, oh man, and the animals are fellow servant, and do you not permit them their path, and their journey to fulfill? Now there is the sphere of light, and you are believing, because of the knowledge of good and evil, that you are not part of that sphere, because of the greed and the curse? But you will be washed clean of what is the curse, for you are to be given new bodies. Now indeed there are them worse than animals. Now a neglected dog is difficult and even not well, and yet a dog not neglected, it is able to be servant of God, also, and doing well with you, indeed happy. Now all the Earth, the animals, are proclaiming good, unless they are ill in some way because of foolishness.

Now then the neighbour of the people, they are religious as well, and they are as another province, and they are with integrity. Now them who keep the day of the Sabbath, they are the people as if of majority, for they indulge in leisure, in eating with neighbours, in indulging in relaxation, for they keep the Sabbath day holy.

Now then remove the retard, not the mentally challenged, and the volcano that rises that is Beelzebub, who is kicked out of his grave, the retard, for he will not be at peace, and the waters will close again, and there will be peace, for there will not be contention anymore.

Now the smart Muslim, they are also called the lie, for they do not really believe, but are smart.

Now what is not on the human spectrum, what human rights does it have, but the angel believes that a man has the right to defend his planet, if what he fights is not on the human spectrum, for he does not believe such is terrorism. Now then there is the misanthropy version of everything, invented by Beelzebub, who will not be at peace, and the fertilizer grandstands, and light shines upon it, and at times it explodes. Now there is not the mixing of politics and religion, for them opposed to God are not able to quote defending their planet.

Now then remove what is not human, the smell that people smell with their ears, from the clouds, that the people are able to accomplish in peace and be at peace, for them kicking at all beauty, liking that dung is thrown periodically, they are not really well and understanding well.

Now there was primitive people, humans, and another tribe of primitive people, and the other tribe was selected by nature, for the atheists, and selected by God, for them who believe in the mystery of God, for the other tribe was retarded and evil in their brutality and retardation. Now the angel does not tolerate the other tribe, the retarded tribe, to be fighting again, for the thing is already decided, and nature, or God, has selected that evil and ignorant tribe to be dead and buried, that though the angel has kicked Beelzebub out of his grave, yet quickly he should fall back to hell. Now they are not on the human spectrum, the other tribe, for there are the two types of terrorism that are misanthropy and communism of serial killer, that you not give wrong words to such things, for there is no language for what is not on the human spectrum, that those not on the human spectrum make claims to phrases and things of humans and yet there is no language upon Earth for them not on the human spectrum, for language is not for them not worthy to be humans, of the human tribe that was chosen by God. Now then the inhuman tribe, yet it throws a rock, yet it conducts some sort of violence when it hears words, yet it is ignorant and retarded, and brute people, and they are even part of the mountain that comes up through the ocean, that is Belzeebub, a king kicked out of his grave, that when the retarded are removed, the ocean will close again, and the religious terrorists and the people will all have people again, for the ocean will not be divided in what is only human, and the atheist, too will have peace, for they do not mention God, but being people of Earth, they mention nature, and why will there be any debate about such, if they choose to call God, nature, for the atheists have their ways, and they are perfectly parallel to the ways of the religious who are not ignorant, that there is no evil for either, whether religious or atheist. Now yet it is the retarded, the mountain of Beelzebub who divide the Ocean, for the religious terrorists will only be called keepers of society, of peace, of the right standard that society may continue, and what is a lie, it will be considered what divides the Ocean. Now though people resent the gate of the great wall, yet do you not listen to the gate keeper? For he is wise, else he would not be the gate keeper, and yet what is already in the city, he does not divide the people, to cast any out, and yet the retarded do not belong behind the wall, but on the outside of the wall. Now then David must be more elite, for he must gather the slaves, of the ignorant tribe, of the mountain of Beelzebub, for light has been sent below Earth, and the slaves and the people are separated. Now then even the agnostics will be divided, that the slaves and the people will not be together, for the gate keeper does not mention these things, for it is the duty of others to separate these.

Now the phrases and terms do not belong to them not on the human spectrum, for they want for language, and yet there is no language, for the bible is all on the human spectrum, and words, language is for the human spectrum.

Now then the children are free, for they do not understand that the adults are free, also, and yet people will follow their principle, whether it is Beelzebub, or some lord of Beelzebub's, for they will together become the action of their principle, and such is good for them, for they will be receiving the rewards and not the punishments, for there is every part of the body of a thing, and each has its purpose, for remove a part and the whole may perish or suffer, for what person says, yet the arm is useless, and so who cares? But the arms, the hand, all are terribly valued. Now then the whole body of Beelzebub, all his people, they come up through the Ocean, they spread as land with their hills, their princes, and they are false kings and false princes, grotesque to be holding noble places and yet always fighting secretly for the enemy, for they judge what is pure, and call it evil, and they divide the Ocean, for there is no religious terrorism, but the Ocean is divided, because of the king, who is Belzeebub, the mountain and volcanoe, and the land judges what is pure, and it is filthy land from hell that does not belong on the surface, and yet with the land gone, there is only the Ocean, an Ocean of pure waters, a different Ocean, and the acts of terrorism are not acts of terrorism, for they are only the right level of the sea as it keeps society, as it holds society at the level of sentience, that there might be peace, that the sphere of light might be whole and pure, that people might have peace and freedom, and not the boasting of freedom, with later chains and hell upon Earth and the abuse of the volcanoe, that the volcanoe, Beelzebub, causes for the Earth, for there is much more abuse and wickedness, more disrespect of people, more disregard for humans, indeed much more, and disgusting behaviour, because of the judgments and divisions of the filthy land that should not divide the Ocean. Now there is no threat to the great wall, or to the gate keeper by the Ocean not having division, for do not be deceived, oh great wall, because the filthy land is below Earth and the wall is from the Earth, for you are good metals and rock, and yet the filthy land is not from the places you are from, for believe not in alliance, for it is such filthy land that will be very evil to you, indeed hates you, and would offer you cruelty, for the land is not your good cousin, but it is your enemy, for trust the eyes of the angel, and you are belonging with Zion, for you are from good places in the Earth, and you will not be lonely and without alliances of other things of the Earth that are from good places. Now Beelzebub, he is religion, he is not much atheism, except some corrupt thing, for he will be anything required, for he is misanthropy, agnostic often, bullying, wicked, for torture, a sicophant, and he is more Kir and Kursh likely by your judgments, and he is the wickedness you hate, for the angel is not deceived and he is eyes for you to consider, to aid the gate and the wall, respectfully, for indeed the agnostic, as they might have mentioned, is indeed what divides, what causes all the evil, and also the lie, the false religious, which are terrorists sometimes who are a lie, who are not in noble things of religion, but are despicable, mean, ignorant, dogmatic, misanthropy, and those things the wall has hated, for though the enemy inside the wall has blasphemed the wall, yet the angel says, the enemy must vacate and be outside the wall, and the good must repent, who were convinced the wall was evil a little, or lead astray in idle cursing, for only repent, for even the angel has been deceived when he was younger, not knowing, and yet he did not curse the wall, and so then repent, you being rallied against the wall, and those who do not belong in Zion, who refuse to repent, who are with the filthy land, yet they will be migrated out, for now the gate keeper may say they have no right, for the gate keeper has something stronger than all, which is the angel, the eyes, who is a great tower in Zion, for the tower is stronger and the Lord is stronger, that the gate keeper may curse those who should migrate out, who are mean, misanthropy, and who bully, and who are not for the noble things of religion, the things of righteousness and nobility.

Now what is in Zion? But there is a great tower, there is a great wall, and yet the volcano that is filthy, it is far outside of Zion.

Now a traitor has already been a traitor, and though they seem like people, they are rebellious and hateful, for they resent with hate, for they have failed and they would attack others before their going into hell. Now will there be rest in hell, or sleep? But they will be in agony forever, and those who have the number of the beast, they are not able to repent any longer, and their words are meaningless, good or bad, for it is as air then, their cursing, as air.

Now then fools who would win against God, you are erased from the Earth, for you will be tortured in hell forever, for there will be total victory over you, and those with God will progress to the next life, and you to the forever dungeon of no hope and pain, put away as refuse, all life taken from you that you sold by your wickedness, for you have sold all your life for your wickedness that you have become utterly impoverished, utterly dead. Now then for a moment you as if stand with insolence, and a moment later, felled from hope and yet those with the Lord, they go on to the next life, and they have not to be knowing of you. Now then pointlessly and invalid you have boasted with your insolence to be mattering as a person to them who are with the Lord, and a moment later, you are vanished with all your ignorant boasting because of your ignorance and blindness. Now then though you have knowledge of good and evil, yet you have life moving towards greater life and life beyond, for you grow greater and better, towards that perfect day. Now then I will lift my hand, despite the boasting of ignorance, the animal nihilism, that is also the boasting of ignorance and blindness, for it is not with truth, and I will swear there is no more time.

Now then it is called Zion ying and yang, and it is atheists and religious people, and there is not agnostic. Now then religion is not creationist, for a different type of evolution they may believe, and yet the atheist is perfectly parallel to the religious and the religious gaining from the diligence and investigation of the atheist. Now so the atheist is people of Earth, of the Earth, and the religious, people of sky and Heavens, of things on land, and the Earth that is the atheist is the good Earth, and not the filthy land that is the agnostics, who each follow their own religion, that is not religion, who play offensive fantasies and injustice that is offensive because of their playing of offensive fantasies in society, for it is not religion, for they each have their own undeveloped religion, as an individual and it is ignorance and offensive injustice, for they are offensive in their foolishness, for they are neither religion or atheist. Now because of their personal playing of fantasies that are not religion, they are bullying much and being ignorant and offensive, and they are protrusion of filthy land coming up from the Ocean to be a problem for ships, for the people who are at peace, and so then the canons are aimed at them justly when they will not yield and cease their wicked bullying of those who are of sound understanding and peace.

Now there is them who hangs upside down from an ankle, and they are insane, and yet are they really dangerous? Now it is determined by them who have understanding whether they are really dangerous, for the time of judgment is over.

Now then the creationist, whether old Earth or not, is not what the angel tells the Earth, for the angel explains the mystery of God, that the Lord works at a very large scale, for do not bully the atheist, because they are people of the Earth, for it is ying and yang, and there is peace, that you not sow discord and evil for Zion. Now as for the atheist, yet the agnostic is not your good cousin, for he is your enemy, and you will have other good alliances that are not your enemy and Zion is your people and you their people, for there will not be any terrorism of religion anymore, when the agnostic is ignored, even removed to deafness of the people, for they are only filthy land that is far outside of Zion, for the atheist does not blaspheme in their science and their research, for let them who accuse of blasphemy mind their own business, and the religious will reap good from them later when they are completed their research, for does the sky mix itself with the Earth, to meddle, or does the Earth mix itself with the sky to meddle? But be considering ying and yang of Zion.

Now them who are the lie, they are claiming religious terrorism, and yet they are more as the agnostic, who is smart, for the priest hood will be called religious and not terrorism, for it is the standard of society without a crutch and broken leg, and the Muslims will not be called terrorism if they are not a lie, for those who are carrying out justice will not be called terrorism, for it is only the standard of the Ocean to dispense of the filthy land, and it is never the dispensing of the atheist in their science, for the atheists are often liking much science, which is the Earth, the foundation that the people walk on. Now if any is dispensing of filthy land, it will not be called terrorism anymore, for the filthy land is Beelzebub and his princes, and so there will be peace and justice of a good Ocean, and the Ocean is a pure Sea of light and the foundation a clean Earth of atheists, and the lie will not be terrorists anymore, for they are a lie, for they were not with the nobility of religion, but liked more ignorance. 

	
לָכֵן הִרְחִיבָה שְּׁאוֹל נַפְשָׁהּ וּפָעֲרָה פִיהָ לִבְלִי־חֹק וְיָרַד הֲדָרָהּ וַהֲמוֹנָהּ וּשְׁאוֹנָהּ וְעָלֵז בָּהּ	 5:14 läkhën hir'chiyväh SH'ôl naf'shäH ûfäáräh fiyhä liv'liy-choq w'yärad hádäräH wahámônäH ûsh'ônäH

angel mountain slope pit perfect light (light below Earth) clay beauty challenge liquid rock lively mountain mountain hills light below Earth

An angel has on the mount of assembly before the pit sent light below Earth that clay beauty challenged liquid rock lively that a king has come up from the Earth with his princes and below Earth is taken with light.

Now the mountain, the king, is the devil that has come up through the waters with his princes and yet he will fall back to hell when they have relieved the retards of their places and removed the excessive dung from the clouds, for if he comes up and rages greatly and spreads his wings wide with lies and nothing yet he shall surely fall back into hell if the diary has kicked him out of his resting place for it was not his resting place to have and he has disturbed the resting places of the righteous, indeed waged war upon the resting places, the settling places of truth and integrity. Now the the sphere of light is again had for there is the pre history and the history and the Christ is given the centre, indeed God is, for Beelzebub has taken ground not his as his resting place. Now by what means things progress, for the greater comes later and prior, for the kings come later within their path, yet it is not known by what means there is change, for the Lord is the name random, for they are too undeveloped in their familiarity with the spirit and the logic and mathematics has perceived a little but not more that what they call random and chance is the spirit of God as well, part of it and part of the mystery of God. Now think the great blasphemer is so offensive? But what enemy really is the high plain above Kursh? Now think the children of men the enemy? But these are believers in the Earth. Now then Beelzebub threatens all and the Great Wall is against those on both sides and so what evil is there? But like not your own wall, Zion?  Now let the wall be at peace to believe what it wants and you believe differently for Beelzebub loves the civil wars of you that turn the great city to dung and mud, and so then be at peace to allow the wall and allow all good things. Now then each man is teaching the way of his group and yet encroach not with your judgments of your group upon another group for the zebra is not judged by the ways of a wall and a wall not by a mountain, for judge not Islam, either by the ways of a small group with you, and Nephtali has its own culture and the fair shade it’s different cultures and the cool of another culture are understood to be of their culture for you will not dare judge another by the culture of another group for it is not familiar with life, for even the dinosaurs were better than such, for even serial killers are those who do this wicked abomination. Now then only Beelzebub is the enemy, indeed all that is not on the human spectrum. Now there is the misanthropy version of everything that is Beelzebub, his people. Now Beelzebub matches the kingdoms of the Lord, for they bring forth a misanthropy version and serial killers by understanding, and so there is a misanthropy version brought forth by the devil for everything and a serial killer for decency and things of decency and yet the devil is not equal or welcome on Earth and the angel separate sheep from goats below Earth for light goes down as a wave of light and a filthy king has come up with his princes and already he had separated the pure sea. Now then the canary of the coal mine, will it not be the flying fiery serpent that is the attack upon religious people? Now it is criminal harassment but a consequence of religion and the flying serpent is not a serpent but a fool and wicked and yet his tongue is from the words of a serpent who had told the people. Now yet the spirits have attacked fornicators who considered things of no consequence, for it is not wise, and yet the spirits have attacked those who would also be insolent or who would be ignorant and wanting to be ignorant and so if the spirits, too, are attacking then it is a consequence of wisdom and it is called criminal harassment, therefore why learn a secret religion? How will them of secret religion be helped by their neighbour against the attack of such a fool?

Now the sky shares what is on land with the ground, for the religious shares the animals and trees with the atheist, for it is a shared ground, for the animals are upon the ground, and they are in the air of the sky, for the ground feeds from them and the sky has them, the air. Now then there are them who only considering what is in the human spectrum of everything, that they are not considering what is not worthy considering, for it is even a religious thing to not consider what is not on the human spectrum. Now then consider much the sewer? But people do not consider the sewer, and if it is even upon land, yet they choose not to consider it.

Now the sewer considers things of the sewer when they are hearing the things of the human spectrum, and so then if you are human, why will you swoop to pick up dung, or swoop to consider the sewer?

Now then you are human, and not before primitive people, in the time of the dinosaurs, and not before dinosaurs, who are not familiar with life, and so then only cast away the scoundrels who reason as if not familiar with life or with humans. Now it would not even be acceptable for a slave? Now it is not acceptable for humans, and yet there are slaves among you, and are they not them of the inhuman tribe at the time of primitive people, them who the Lord selected for extinction? Now they may not challenge again, and yet Beelzebub comes up from the Earth to challenge again, for he will not be at peace, for he has been kicked out of his grave. Now why will you call the tribe that was selected for extinction, as being primitive? But it is not fair to primitive people, for they were having nobility, and they were human.

Now Eretz Chadrack is not a theocracy and neither is the agnostic a theocracy unto themselves, and yet the Earth is a ball of light and complete and the Lord, God, and the Christ are its centre and so the agnostic is cast away, for there is truth and not theocracy for the Earth is a ball of light and the Heavens are present, for the Lord is creator of the large cosmic event by which the Universe was formed and the atheist claims they do not believe in God for they believe in the Earth, for they provide the Earth as believers in the Earth and they are the foundation. Now then the Earth has formed, the plants have come and the time for the animals and the foundation has provided and the Heavens come with the fourth day and bless the Earth.

Now the foundation has been much established by the atheists, the Heavens much offered by the diary, and yet there is always more, and more again, and there is the small and the great amount more and the great amount more, and the greater amount, and it is only a planet. Now then if there are any who are bullying the gate and the wall when there is no reason, how should the wall allow them to enter a nation? Now those who pass through the gate easily, are they not those who are already citizens of the Earth, the yang or the ying? 

Now then the land is established, and it has named the animals, and the angel has come and named, and yet the humans were already, and they are offered a tree of six days, of knowledge of good and evil, and it is another tree of knowledge of good and evil that it is not the tree of life, the Sabbath, that reigns. Now Adam remained with the eternal Sabbath a little longer than Eve, and so Eve departed from the eternal Sabbath, and then her husband.

Now then there is the woman more man than man, and if she takes the number of the beast, there is no ability for repentance for her. Now then the word is complete, for it goes to the number of the beast, the wrong that disappears to hell and the right and goes to eternal life, for you are already with eternal life and transitioning into eternal life, for hear not the nothing of those who would speak as if there is no transition. 

Now if a man takes the number of the beast, yet there is no ability for him to repent anymore.

Now misanthropy is a scoundrel, and a serial killer, a Judas Iscariot, a flame of hell and bloodshed, and they are that which is hated by them of hell. Now above the serial killer is hell, and them of hell, and yet a person of justice, a flame of light, a fire of Heaven. Now then Heaven is not divided against Heaven.

Now then how are the princes of Beelzebub, the agnostic kings of anything? But they are great by what they have eaten, and they were eating trash, and others have eaten their own dung, and the princes of Beelzebub, his hills, they are belonging beneath the land, for the Earth is over them, for they are from a deep place in the Earth. Now then if slaves are over the princes of Beelzebub, believe an angel will speak to a prince? But the angel will speak to Beelzebub, and yet Beelzebub clings to the foot, he attempts, and why will he be troubling any? Now as religion that is evil, let the atheists tread Beelzebub, also, and let the slaves tread Beelzebub, for his flesh is melted from his skull, and filth is preferred more than flesh by him.

Now him who boasts of humanity, they curse the sky, the Heavens, for if they boast of humanity with a rebellious manner, they are the fertilizer of the Earth, upon the field that sends up a stench.

Now do not blaspheme the Heavens, the animals, the Earth, and do not profane and blaspheme the Sabbath that reigns over the six days.

Now you do not dress as a soldier of cities or as a soldier with battle bow for it is offence to the people, for to wear religious clothing not fulfilled by substance is the mocking of religion, the hurling of boulders. Now such is a boulder that is ignorant and it shall not be pushed into the valley of Earth to roll about. 

Now the scoundrel who will not give what is owed, even to a good degree, who will not give honour, who will not give tithe if they are of the ability to tithe, their intestines will be split and it will harden their heart.

Now then what thing will happen to the righteous? But what thing will happen to any who is the Lord's? But were some not profane? Now have some been stubborn? But exalt not yourself in the boasting of goodness, for not all those who exalt themselves are really acceptable. Now not all them elite are really very elite as they should be. Now then if the higher are not adequate, is not treachery suspected? But believe the stubborn? Now there is no Kir and Kursh in power anymore in America, and the religious agnostics, who ate trash in many ways, who feed trash to the people, who exalted with trash and folly, indeed that time is over, and there is a time for peace, for there is not always time for war, for allow peace to win, for there is no war against the Sabbath, and there is no war concerning peace, for permit peace to win, you who would believe in rebellion and yet have no reason, and aid peace with wanting of peace, for to be ambitious for peace, it is the wanting of the Lord. Now then do they not want for prosperity for all, for the scoundrels to be left out, for they have blockaded the Lord's people, and they have strategized with closed eyes to themselves, strategizing greatly to blockade the Lord's people, those who were owed, who had fulfilled, and so the scoundrels have given evil for good, and it is only the things of humans to give good for good where it is right, and yet not the things of dinosaurs. Now all those who have the diary, they are greater than John the Baptist if they are able to obey and follow these things, to be in religion.

Now then if any is in wickedness, do they not know that wickedness opens it mouth with projection? Now projection is profanity added to projection, and it is insolent, but a person of repentance, they are having guilt.

Now if everything is having its place but the devil's kingdoms, than these things must remain in their own realm on Earth, for they will not judge what is not in their realm, in a profane and striving way, to be wicked, for they must have a reasonable humility. Now them who are reasonable, yet they are not considered proud if they are seeming proud, for they are reasonable, and yet them who are overly proud, they are misanthropy, profanity, insolence, wickedness, and they retaliate against the justice of the Lord, against reality, against right and wrong. Now these are angry, wrathful, having no accountability, for pride has not accountability, and yet them having accountability, they are not considered proud.

Now bring not the dung of a thing to make an argument against a thing, and make not the misanthropy version, to be against a thing, for though you gather dung, making the dung yourself, yet you are disgusting in such, a despicable and disgusting thing in such.

Now then the group of scoundrels, is naturally exclusive, and it is the biggest problem of abundance in Eretz Chadrack, for they will not do business where they should and they shut their doors and keep out the nation, for they do not owe the nation or the people in their imaginings. Now then when not expected to offer anything, yet do not some volunteer themselves to defend against good messages and to stand in the way, railing as if the messages were for them? Now such is a natural brute beast, and are they not close to the number of the beast, for what scoundrel is it whose breath is so taken from them? Now then the breath of the agnostic is taken, for they are idle in firm truth. Now them who breath, they have a thing, and them who drink, and who eat, and yet the scoundrel has nothing, and will not even that nothing be taken from them?

Now then change not religion into a filthy religion of money, for they turn a meal to stone and there are rocks in their mouth, and eating rocks soon they are becoming unwell. Now they change religion to religion of profanity and being profane, of being insolent, of being nihilistic, which is wicked, and they lack bread and air.

Now a rolling stone, they call it a wacko.

Now them who join to a prostitute if she is still a prostitute, is he not still much better off than him who is a scoundrel, whose air is taken?

Now the boulders, they are mocking and wearing religious clothing without substance, and they are hidden rocks also, are they not, that are for the bottom of the ships of the Lord. 

Now an ice berg is soon melted, and it has nothing to offer that it might be praised, but a giant tree, it is blessed by the people who are worth considering, for the giant tree is worth considering.

Now Jupiter is a tree of knowledge of good and evil, and at present it is a tree not known about by all the Earth, for it is deep within the forests.

Now the Lion, America, it is the wisdom of a Lion, and yet while considering the Lion, the other animals must use their wisdom to establish peace that will also be peace for the Lion. Now Beelzebub will not be at peace, for he is often kicked from his grave to wage war for no reason, for everything is dwelling at peace in their domain, even in their resting places, but Beelzebub is kicked out of his grave again to wage war. Now then place deafness upon your ears, for he speaks insults and iniquity, for why will you hear him and his meldok, his lunatic raging of wrath and hate? But allow him to sink back into hell, and let him die upon the vine where you can, and resist him where you should, for he is a volcano that comes up from filthy places, to be filthy land with his filthy princes who have no nobility, and his princes are as if to be kings of the Lord's people, and kings among the Lord's kingdoms, and they have no rights in the Lord's kingdoms, and their agnostic ways give them nothing but evidence of eating and drinking, for they are great by their eating and drinking. Now then if they rise again because of Kir and Kursh, and the attack on the planet that was orchestrated by part of the lie that enabled Kir and Kursh, yet is there a new group of zealots with the same name, that might work with David, even if not with the Lion that was attacked with cowardliness, with a catapult, or a flying spear from what was part of the lie? Now then if those with the same name are not the same group that did such, yet expect the Lion to be wicked, to be at peace with them? But then it is for Eretz Chadrack, friend of the Lion, and not for the Lion, that the Lion might have peace, for the serpent, Dagon, wishes for zealots to be working with David, for we shall be branches of peace for the Lion, indeed a tree for the Lion to rest beside, and the serpent, Dagon, he will be a river for the Lion to drink, and Eretz Chadrack, a wall of rocks to keep the Lion's land in peace.

Now then a human has mentioned, a man who finds a wife finds favour of the Lord, and yet if it is not at the level of wife, by the Universe, for the Lord is the Universe, and it is part of the mystery of God, than will he find favour if he attempts to place her where she does not belong. Now then none should strive with false psychology, and none should claim they are rightfully in a better place and yet there is not really offence, for if she is as if young by folly, a concubine, and the husband old, and yet young, than there is none being treated unfairly, but only not all are able to attain, for folly has made it so. Now then what shall it matter? Only a man cannot dwell with a concubine, for how will she care for him later when she is taking care of him? But the wife is great later. Now her who becomes worse and worse, diminishing to worse places, what will be her place of ceasing to become worse? But a wise woman goes from wisdom to wisdom, and becomes draped in light.

Now them not spoken to, did they respond? But let them from whom nothing is expected mind their own business, and also them not worth considering, who should still not be considered, for it is not good to be considering them.

Now then a wife is her who is rich, by mala, and yet a poor woman, she is devoured by foolishness and hell.

Now then if you are rich, by mala, will you not go from riches to more riches? But foolishness, it makes poor.

Now then the scoundrel is upside down, for he is utterly poor by mala, and it is his poverty that is his strategy for money, and he is even much turning capitalism to terrorism. Now he has exchanged gold for bird dung, for he would rather not money that is gold, but rather money that is bird dung. Now then do commerce in gold slabs and bars, large and small bars, that you consider not money in your dealings.

Now then hasten not any to becoming a slave, even if they are to become a Judas Iscariot, for why will you help them with wisdom if their heart is already in hell? But when the Judas Iscariot's head exploded, he lost track of who he was speaking to, and there are times he does not mind his own business, whether found with male or female, though they are men who are Judas Iscariot. Now then reason with false psychology? But what a woman does, if it is wicked or foolish, she does to herself, and she does nothing to the man, for animal nihilism is ignorance and ignorance of understanding. Now if a woman has hated the Christ, yet she not a thing of rock that is covered in dung, and a thing that would shed the blood of the Christ? But believe she has hated any man? But it is the Christ that she hates. Now she has gone from worse to worse, and already was it not determined much? But an imposter is her, and bitter? Now yet if any woman is a little lower than a garden slave, and yet the man of a house loves her, will she not be welcome? Now she will be lower than early loves of a man, and yet she is loved, also, and there is no evil to it, for it is even well, and so therefore only follow the Lord is what is right, for the Lord is the Universe, and a man is not the Universe. Now then the truth is a sphere of light, and the Earth is a sphere of light, for the Universe is a sphere of light, the galaxy, also. Now then how will the angel provide the sphere of light? But is there even time to provide much? 

Now then on the human spectrum of vision, there is a wicked accusation, on the wider view, that it is great projection, only not on the human spectrum. Now then vision that is full is a sphere of light around a person, around and below, for it is full vision.

Now be not believing yourself jealous, and be not angry, if you are only lacking a tithe to a person's barrel, for the angel has understood the cause of it.

Now all psychology has no application or else it is not sound psychology, for there is no application for psychology, and it is part of the foundation, part of the ground of the Earth that people walk upon.

Now then though a garden slave has the clouds as their gods, to tell them right and wrong, yet have not the clouds taught all that a person does not want to be, that they cause not offence? Now to men, have they not taught all that usually a man who is full of lies and boasting, as if he is now not full of lies and boasting because the clouds have rescued him? Now such are clouds without rain, and the entertainments are usually clouds without rain.

Now then when the clouds of music do not rain, yet is it an intentional drought? Now why will they attempt to rid the planet of such rain? Now it is the belief of the angel that the Lord cares for such things, and yet the angel does not know.

Now the idols of the garden slaves are with the clouds, but people do not bow to them in consideration, and yet rain they consider.

Now then who has spoken to an animal that they respond? But who has called him or her a woman or man? But they are kicked back into the river of fire to take the number of the beast, herded along by demons and their comforting and defence against truth and common sense and so you may not test the Lord to let these in the river of fire pull you into the river, but they must hear common sense and ignore the comforting of demons who would have them mutilated who are adopted by the animals, who are in the river of fire, for the demons are hating them, and they are as machines that do their task. Now if they are not accepting guilt and keeping to the human spectrum they will be turned from animal to brute beast. Now then why then does the angel tell people? But will he not be as a good Shepard that considers the fallen, that they might still be people, that they might exit the lake of fire, that they might not be animals? Now for what reason will any be killed in body? But the river of fire will kill them worse than death, for they will not go to life. Now then ask not the Shepard to disobey God, for it is not human, and so then the angel comes for the people and not for the animals. Now the angel has given much time, for he gives time with each thing, and yet it is the Universe, God, that judges, for it is the Lord, and it is part of the mystery of God. Now God is perfect, a perfect light, and He is called the Universe, and is He not more beyond the Universe, to be even greater than the Universe? Now then is it easier to say, the Universe, or to say, God? But take then the portion of the atheist, who looks to the ground? But take then the portion of the religious, who looks towards the Heavens? Now then it is ying and yang, and together they are a full thing. Now as for the middle ground, the filthy land, neither hot or cold, neither religious or atheist, it is Beelzebub and his filthy princes who believe themselves kings.

Now then the planet is even comical, for there are them who did not want the head on the phallus and rather turned themselves into fertilizer, as if the fertilizer for the young who require it.

Now then the non insolent can be comical when they refuse to have class or be honourable, and yet the profane, the insolent, they are becoming Beelzebub and moving towards the number of the beast.

Now better fertilizer than Beelzebub.

Now then a Jew who is mostly made of profane, they are them who are not really being a Jew, for the Jews are called to be holy, and in nobility of holiness. Now then them who say they are a Jew by nihilism, by some other things not of Jews, by nihilism and lack of the ten commandments in any way, these are wicked, and with wickedness and insolence.

Now then the harem, the Muslims, yet they are as guards chosen by God, provided by the Lord, and they are concerning angels, for they serve the Lord, and they are high people, the Muslims, and yet without the angels, what peace can there be for Jews and Muslims, for the thing is not completed. Now what the prophet Mohammad has given is perfect, and it is for the Muslims, and those called to be Muslims and none is high to judge, for the ledge is higher than them, that you know that them who make a spectacle of themselves to be ignorant, as some of the gentiles, my own people, have made a display of ignorance to judge, stepping past the lines of war time propaganda that was only for soldiers, taking a leap past that line, they are greatly profaning in their spectacle of being ignorant to judge Muslims, or to judge religion when they do not understand, for they judge by the authority of a filthy mountain, agnostic, and the mountain in Beelzebub, that he is false righteous, and filthy, for it is called filthy righteous, and wicked, and its judgment is ignorance, to condemn what is right. Now it is Beelzebub's mouth that speaks from them when they do so, and even Peter has opened his mouth with Beelzebub towards the Christ, and do not believe it is a small matter to be channelling Beelzebub through your mouth, for it is not good, and so then be in obedience to God that you not be insolent and profane, for Beelzebub is made of profane, and he is insolent, and he is also meldok, and filthy land, and yet there are them aligned with a cast temporarily by God, and it is good and well, that they have been out of joint, and yet soon they will be receiving the benefits of the cast.

Now will not a fiery flying serpent be the result of me, indeed, and it is a serpent of foolishness, for it comes from the mouths of transgressors, of fools, of fire of hell, who mock and who harass with the things of religion, as they blaspheme. Now it is already apprehended by soldiers of cities.

Now the agnostic who worships the clouds, the concepts, the shapes, they are a polytheist, and alliance they have with the fertilizer that sends up a stench towards the clouds, of rebellion without reason or cause, for they are eating and drinking, and they are having the clouds, the concepts and shapes and ideas as their religion, and they are not different than the polytheists of India, where they have built the angel's buildings, worn their clothing, and then indulged in demons and iniquity, indeed meldok as well. Now for what reason have they built the angel's buildings, worn their clothing, made art work that is beautiful and grand? But then have they built Bethlehem, the buildings as acceptable, and worn the clothing of angels, silk and gold, and yet bowed away many times, bowing low to the ground, not considering themselves worthy of the things they have built? Now then are not many of them chosen for Islam? But there should not be an agnostic who is speaking of the angel, for they speak as traitors, for they are enemies, and so if they would speak as if with peace, yet they are not with the angel, and so then they should not speak of the angel if they are agnostic, but only if they are atheist or religious.

Now all men and women have the angel as part of them for they are made of six days, even seven.

Now then what is the fourth day? But it is romance, and the fourth day is within you and them who profane a sacred day, does the fourth day not know? Now the angel is the fourth day. Now then if you will support the fourth day will you not be wearing red? Now the women may wear red to support the fourth day for it is a day of romance, and yet all the colours they may wear. Now there are six sacred days and the seventh is the Sabbath that rules the six. Now was not the Christ brought forth on the first day, the morning? Now for three periods he was below the Earth in the layers of rocks with the dinosaurs and three days again and on the third day he rose, the beginning of man, for he is the morning and the man, the morning star, from Jessie, son and Lord of David, also the word, the Devar Hashem.

Now then a man is made of six days and then the seventh and so he speaks against himself to speak against a day. Now then the angel is the fourth day

Now what a person says against a day they say concerning themselves, for it is a rude way of confession, and them without impairment of understanding can understand.

Now then if the agnostics have meldok, the filthy land, if they are Lord children kings of many men, if they are attempting to kidnap the staff, as if a child who is kidnapped, to teach the staff as God would, to disable the staff, indeed they are waging war against God, and is it not also so that not even the Hindu people are trying to do such? Now then it is delusions of granduer to believe any person can teach the staff anything it would not already know, especially if they are simple things, and the agnostics, the igno-slacks, they are not producing their own writings, for if they play a child's game, to say we taught the staff because the staff had not already written a thing, yet the thing they teach is simple and they are being very wicked, for they say, we know nothing, to the staff, for it is Beelzebub that they are to try to steal the staff, to grab it from the Lord, to knock it from his hand, for with what righteousness will the agnostic oppose the Lord, or the angel, but they are having much delusions of grandeur, and the things they teach a child would be able to teach, and indeed a child has surpassed them. Now then what shall be committed to them as a just recompense, that they begin a war that is already won, for they will not allow peace to win, for Beelzebub is kicked from his grave and will not be at peace, and retarded children have committed wickedness, indeed begun a war in their trying to steal the staff, in trying to teach the staff before the staff is able to tell them the truth, for they have delusions of grandeur, and they are an abomination of sin, and they have engorged themselves on swine, and they would rule of whole Earth, the agnostics of Kir and Kursh, and as ignorant people they have begun a war in their wickedness, and their hatred. Now because they kidnapped the staff to be wicked, because they attempted to disable the staff with what what was not even worthy of a child, for a child cast it away as worthless and not worthy mentioning, for it was nothing to a child, indeed they are the sickly dung at the feet of a child, and because the agnostic casts their children into the fire, as if their children should be killed, who are better than them, for the agnostic has nothing of value, the children would not be harmed, not even a little, and the angel will bless their children, because the children cast the things of the agnostics away as being worthless, for the children are given blessing by the angel, and they will be kings and queens of the agnostics, for they were children worthy to be called children, and the agnostics, children worthy to be called children of the devil, for the children of the devil are sickly dung on the ground. Now so there will be no discord between the children and the Lord's people, and the agnostics are given to you, oh children, for you are adults with concerns to them, for you knew how worthless their brilliance was, how they are only a sickly a flexible dung saying things not worth writing down, not worthy remembering before more important things, even games, are carried out. Now because you stole food, and the agnostics eat food, but you would not dare do the wickedness of the agnostics, you are having the two great things of them that you did right, and the agnostics are your servants, and you are the adults over them, and so the agnostics will go through you, answering to you, and questioning you, and going before you before they are able to consider going to the angel, for they may not approach the angel, for you are the adults concerning them, and they are your servants, and given to you as servants by the angel.

Now then the head of the phallus, though they say, yet it has been fine before, and we have been without it for a long time, and it is even soaring, erect, yet still the head of the phallus is even a practical thing to have. Now they might claim, yet the nation is soaring, erect, yet it is not a matter of impotence, but what does it matter if there is no head on the phallus? Now is the agnostic being so practical that they say, yet it is not required, for the nation functions without it, yet it is even practical to have. Now though impotence is depression of the nation, yet what is impotence, for the nation is soon potent again, but if there is no head upon the phallus, yet believe it does not matter? Now how will the nation prosper? But the agnostic turns themselves to fertilizer, when they are not insolent, to be rebelling without cause or reason, and yet they are with meldok, for they fight for no people, and they fight only for themselves, and they are what a small child threw away as not worth considering, for they had play, which was more important, and things they say are of more intelligence and importance, even child things, for the agnostic says, yet it is brilliant, yet a child has considered it also, and it was not worth writing down or considering, for all the brilliance of the agnostic, it is better performed by the child, and yet the child has things of importance to do, for a child is an adult concerning the agnostic. Now the agnostic is with meldok, for they are Lord children, and kings of many men, leaders with their great army, the nation, to support all their disrespect, which is only a spectacle of ignorance, for the agnostic is the dung of the baby even, when it was ill, and a child is better than the agnostic, and the child had right to be a child, but the agnostic had right to grow to adolescence. Now the agnostic is them who has a great mission, given to them in their meldok, and yet they defend no one but themselves, they fight for no one but themselves, and they rebel for no one but themselves, and a child has considered all of their reasoning not worthy of time, for it is not on the human spectrum, but is foolishness below children. Now misanthropy, too, is beneath the child, and it is considered wickedness and abomination, a child who is evil by them, and yet if the adult is worse, does the adult not become Beelzebub, with the zeal of misanthropy, with the meldok of misanthropy, to be Lord of many many, indeed believing they have support of much when they have a sliver upon an explosive thing in the pouring of rain, and the falling of rocks.

Now think not all who are agnostic are what is in these books called agnostic, for there are them agnostic, and yet it is only called child of the kingdom of the Lord, for such is what the Christ has mentioned, that they are still young in knowledge in many ways of the things of religion, although they may have much wisdom in other things, that they are old in other things. Now then be not offended, for all are servants, the king, the most obedient servant, and all are children in some things. Now such agnostics that are only called children of the kingdom, they are not polytheists, for they do not have a false thing as God, or the shapes of the clouds as their idols, but they have God as their God, and they are not having gained as much in knowledge of religion. Now all them who have the diaries, who are really advanced to such a level as the fullness of the diaries, they are greater than John the Baptist.

Now then be not a madman, who climbs over the fence, who has grievance with where things are placed and how they are set up by the facilitators of the grand place, who had the wealth to pay to enter through the gate, but instead climbed the fence and began to argue, for they are not well, and scoundrels even, for first pay before the gate, and then enter, and then you will speak about things inside the walls of the great enclosed nation that angel has given, for the nation is partnered with the soldiers of cities, even the soldiers, and yet them who climb the fence and begin to debate, question, yet though they seem not to know better and mean well, yet they are still an offence, and must be escorted out. Now first they should tithe, and if they are questioning where things are, or what is there, yet they must be great investors, paying the whole wealth of a very wealthy if they would desire to question where things have been placed, and as for them, do they even dare to question? But they are investors, great trees, great tithers and partners, and even Mars are some of them, if they will partner, for they are made a god in the Heavens for a time. Now then though those who do not have the wealth to pay may enter freely, for they pay in other ways, yet them who have the wealth, are they not a scoundrel? Now speak not bad of the angel before you have tithed, for first tithe, for you will not be heard if you have not tithed, for you have no right to be heard, and you have no right to be heard in anything greater unless you are Mars, for Mars is a god for a time. Now yet you may be taught and you may ask questions, and the righteous know what is acceptable, but the madman or madwoman, are they to be the tribe of people the Lord selected for extinction that the primitive people might continue, for why is it that Beelzebub cannot be at peace, even concerning misanthropy, he is kicked out of his grave.


















